-adb

DESCRIPTION	The adb command provides an interactive C program debugger
		that has a full subset of commands.

SYNTAX		adb [ -w ] [ object ] [ core ]

		  object   Name of object program to be debugged.  If not 
			   specified, uses a.out in current directory.

		  core     Name of program's core dump.  If not specified,
			   uses core in current directory.

OPTIONS		-w   Creates object and core files, if necessary.

DOCUMENTATION   adb(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Tutorial Introduction to ADB" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-admin

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS admin command creates SCCS files or changes parameters
		of existing SCCS files.

SYNTAX		sccs admin [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be created or administered.

OPTIONS		-a  Adds specified user (-aname) to list of those permitted
		    to make changes (deltas) to existing SCCS files.
       		-d  Turns off (deletes) specified flag (-dxx).  Useful flags
		    are: b (allows branches), d (sets default delta number),
		    i (treats no ID keywords as fatal error), and t (module
		    type).  For a complete list of flags, read the admin
		    manual page.
		-e  Erases specified user (-ename) from list of those permitted
		    to make changes (deltas) to existing SCCS files.
		-f  Turns on specified flag (-fxx).  See -d option.
		-h  Checks the structure of the SCCS file.
		-i  Creates SCCS file (first delta) using text from specified 
		    file (-ifile). 
		-m  Inserts specified modification request numbers (-mlist).
		-n  Creates a new SCCS file.
		-r  Indicates initial release number (-r#).  Must be used with
		    -i option.  If not specified, uses 1.0.
		-t  Replaces descriptive text of an existing SCCS file with 
		    contents of specified file (-tfile).
		-y  Inserts specified comment (-ystring) as comment for initial
		    delta.  If not specified, uses default comment line.
		-z  Recomputes SCCS file checksum (used with corrupted SCCS 
		    files).

DOCUMENTATION	admin(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the 
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-apropos

DESCRIPTION	The apropos command displays the sections of the 
		ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual that contain references
		to each specified word in the title descriptions.

SYNTAX	  	apropos word...

		  word   Each word for which references are to be 
			 displayed.

DOCUMENTATION   apropos(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ar

DESCRIPTION	The ar command creates and maintains archive libraries.

SYNTAX		ar key [ pos ] archive file...

		  pos	     Key and file name (keyname) used in adding, 
			     moving, or replacing files.  Position keys are:
			     a (after file) and b or i (before file).  If not 
			     specified, adds new file to end of archive.

		  archive    Name of archive library (file).

		  file       Name of each file to be archived.

KEYS		c   Creates new archive, but suppresses normal message.
		d   Deletes each named file from archive.
		l   Uses local (current) directory when making a temporary copy
		    of each specified file.
		m   Moves each named file to position, if used, or end of 
		    archive.
		p   Displays each specified file.
		q   Quickly adds each named file to end of archive.
		r   Replaces existing file and places new copy at position,
		    if used, or at end of archive.  If u character is added,
		    checks modification date of both files.  Then, replaces
		    existing file only if its modification date is earlier 
		    than that of the new copy.
		t   Displays table of contents containing each named file.  If 
		    not specified, displays table containing all files.
		v   Displays verbose information for each named file added to 
		    archive.
		x   Extracts each named file from archive.  If not specified,
		    extracts all files from archive.

DOCUMENTATION	ar(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-as

DESCRIPTION	The as command assembles each specified file into a single
		executable program.

SYNTAX		as [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be assembled.

OPTIONS		-    Treats all undefined symbols as globals.
		-V   Leaves references to all global variables unresolved.
		-o   Writes output to specified file (next argument).  
		     If not specified, defaults to a.out.

DOCUMENTATION	as(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Assembler Reference Manual" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 2
-at

DESCRIPTION	The at command builds a script file to be executed by the shell
		at the later, designated time.

SYNTAX		at time [ day ] [ file ]

		  time    Up to 4 digits (hhmm, 24-hour clock) and optional 
			  letter: A (am), P (pm), N (noon), or M (midnight).

		  day     Either month name plus day number or day name.

		  file    Name of file from which commands for script are to
			  be read. If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			  and uses this as input.

EXAMPLES	at 1P fri report1
		at 1000A jan20 report2

DOCUMENTATION	at(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-awk

DESCRIPTION	The awk command provides a pattern scanning and processing
		language that has a full subset of language constructs.
 
SYNTAX		awk [ options ] [ string ] [ file... ]

		  string   Each pattern and action.  For further information,
			   read the awk manual page.

		  file     Name of each file to be scanned.  If not specified,
			   or if dash (-) is specified, reads stdin until 
			   <CTRL/D> and scans this input.

OPTIONS		-F   Sets interfield separator to specified character (-Fc).
		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) as input for patterns
		     and actions.

DOCUMENTATION	awk(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Awk--A Pattern Scanning and Processing Language" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-basename

DESCRIPTION	The basename command strips all directory prefixes from the
		specified pathname.

SYNTAX		basename path [ suffix ]

		  path     Pathname from which all preceding directory names 
			   are to be deleted.

		  suffix   Suffix which, if present in pathname, also is to 
			   be deleted.

DOCUMENTATION	basename(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-bc

DESCRIPTION	The bc command provides an interactive arithmetic language 
		processor that has a full language subset.

SYNTAX		bc [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file from which input is to be read.

OPTIONS		-c   Compiles input only.
		-l   Uses standard math library (/usr/lib/lib.b).

DOCUMENTATION	bc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"BC -- An Arbitrary Precision Desk-Calculator Language" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-bdiff
	
DESCRIPTION	The bdiff command displays the textual differences between two 
		big files.

SYNTAX		bdiff file1 file2 [ lines ] [ -s ]

		  file1   Names of files whose differences are to be 
		  file2   displayed.  If - is specified for either file,
			  reads stdin until <CTRL/D> in place of that file
			  and displays differences between this input and
			  data in the specified file.

		  lines   Number of lines each segment is to contain.  If not
			  specified, splits each file into segments containing
			  3500 lines each before determining their differences.

OPTIONS		-s   Suppresses normal diagnostic messages.

DOCUMENTATION	bdiff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-bfs

DESCRIPTION	The bfs command allows you to scan large text
		files (maximum 1024K bytes and 32K lines).

SYNTAX	  	bfs [ - ] file

		  file   Name of the file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-   Suppresses all character count displays.
		
DOCUMENTATION   bfs(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-binmail

DESCRIPTION	The binmail command provides an interactive program
		with a full set of subcommands for sending or receiving
		mail messages.

SYNTAX	  	/bin/mail [ options ] [ user... ]

		  user   Name of each user to which mail is to be sent.
			 If not specified, reads current mail, if any, 
			 from your mailbox file.

OPTIONS		-f   Displays mail messages contained in the specified
		     file (next argument) in place of your mailbox file.
		-p   Displays mail messages directly (does not require
		     disposition command).
		-q   Exits binmail session without affecting (updating)
		     your mailbox file.
		-r   Displays mail messages in a first-in, first-out
		     order.

EXAMPLES	/bin/mail
		/bin/mail -f mbox

DOCUMENTATION	binmail(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cal

DESCRIPTION	The cal command displays a calendar for the specified month or
		year.

SYNTAX		cal [ month ] year
 
		  month  Month number: 1-12.  If specified, displays calendar
			 for that month only.

		  year   Year number: 1-9999. 

EXAMPLES	cal 1985
		cal 4 1900

DOCUMENTATION	cal(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-calendar

DESCRIPTION	The calendar command provides a calendar reminder service by
		reading a user-created file and displaying all lines containing
		the current date.

SYNTAX		calendar [ - ]
  
DOCUMENTATION	calendar(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cat

DESCRIPTION	The cat command concatenates each specified file into a 
		continuous output stream.

SYNTAX		cat [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be concatenated.  If not 
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and writes
			 this input to stdout.

OPTIONS		-b   Ignores all blank lines and precedes each output line
		     with its line number.
		-e   Displays a dollar sign ($) at end of each line.
		-n   Precedes all output lines (including blank lines) with
		     line numbers.
		-s   Squeezes multiple blank lines from output: single spaces
		     output.
		-t   Displays all nonprinting character (including tabs):
		     <CTRL/X> as ^X, <DELETE> as ^?, non-ASCII characters 
		     (with high bit set) as M- followed by low bits character,
		     and tabs as ^I.
		-u   Unbuffers all output.  Normally, output is buffered.
		-v   Displays all nonprinting characters (excluding tabs): 
		     <CTRL/X> as ^X, <DELETE> as ^?, and non-ASCII characters 
		     (with high bit set) as M- followed by low bits character.

DOCUMENTATION	cat(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cb

DESCRIPTION	The cb command uniformly spaces and indents C programs. 

SYNTAX		cb

DOCUMENTATION	cb(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cc

DESCRIPTION	The cc command compiles and links C programs.

SYNTAX		cc [ options ] file...
  
		  file   Name of each file to compiled and/or linked.

OPTIONS		-B   Finds substitutes for compiler passes from files with 
		     suffixes cpp, c0, c1, and c2 in named path (-Bpath).  
		     If path is not specified, uses /usr/c/o directory.
		-D   Defines name to specified value (-Dname=value).  If value
		     not specified, defined to 1.
		-E   Runs preprocessor (cpp) only and writes output to stdout.
		-I   Searches named directory (-Idirectory) for include files. 
		-N   Places switch tables into text space.
		-O   Uses the object code optimizer (c2).
		-P   Runs preprocessor (cpp) and writes output to .i files.
		-S   Compiles programs and writes output to .s files.
		-U   Removes initial definition of name (-Uname).
		-V   Generates code suitable for overlaid programs.
		-Y   Compiles the named C programs with the SYSTEM V
		     compatibility library.  The /lib/libcV.a library is 
		     loaded prior to the /lib/libc.a library.
		-c   Suppresses loading and produces an object (.o) file even 
		     if only one program is being complied.
		-o   Writes output to specified file (next argument).
		-p   Produces count of times each routine is called.
		-t   Finds substitute compiler pass from path named with -B
		     option and optional key (-t[x...]).  Optional keys are:
		     p (cpp), 0 (c0), 1 (c1), and 2 (c2).  

DOCUMENTATION	cc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Tour through the UNIX C Compiler" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
		"The C Programming Language--Reference Manual" and "UNIX 
		Programming--Second Edition" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-cd

DESCRIPTION	The cd command changes your current directory to the specified
		directory.

SYNTAX		cd [ directory ]

		  directory   Name of directory to be changed to.  If not 
			      specified, changes to your home directory.

DOCUMENTATION	cd(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cdc

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS cdc command changes the commentary for the specified
		release number (delta).

SYNTAX		sccs cdc [ options ] file...

		  file  Name of each file to be changed.

OPTIONS		-m  Adds or deletes the specified modification numbers (-m##),
		    from delta commentary.  Must be used with -r option.
		-r  Indicates delta number (-r#).
		-y  Changes commentary to specified string (-ystring).  Must 
		    be used with -r option.

DOCUMENTATION	cdc(1) in the  ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-check

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS check command displays a list of file names of SCCS 
		files that are currently being edited.  If none are being  
		edited, returns exit status only.

SYNTAX		sccs check 

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-checkeq

DESCRIPTION	The checkeq command checks each specified file for unmatched
		eqn codes.

SYNTAX		checkeq [ file... ]

		  file    Name of each file to be checked.  If not specified,
			  reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and checks this input.

DOCUMENTATION	eqn(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-checkmm

DESCRIPTION	The checkmm command checks the mm macro coding in the
		specified text file.

SYNTAX	  	checkmm [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each text file to be processed.
			 If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and processes this input.

DOCUMENTATION   mm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Memorandum Macros" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-chfn

DESCRIPTION	The chfn command changes the personal information in 
		your /etc/passwd entry.

SYNTAX		chfn

DOCUMENTATION	chfn(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chgrp

DESCRIPTION	The chgrp command changes the group ID of each specified
		file to that of the named group.

SYNTAX		chgrp group file...

		  group   Name of group whose ID is to be applied.

		  file    Name of each file to be changed.

EXAMPLES	chgrp bin program1 program2 program3

DOCUMENTATION	chown(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chmod

DESCRIPTION	The chmod command changes the mode (access permissions)
		of each specified file.

SYNTAX		chmod mode file...

		  mode   Mode (access permissions) to be applied.
			 You can specify mode in octal or symbolic
			 representation (see below).    

		  file   Name of each file to be changed.

   Octal representations are	      Symbolic representations are
   formed by adding:		      formed by combining, in order:
					     
       0400  Owner read permission		u  Owner
       0200  Owner write permission	  	g  Group 
       0100  Owner execute permission		o  Other
       0040  Group read permission	    	+  Adds permissions 
       0020  Group write permission	   	-  Removes permissions
       0010  Group execute permission	 	=  Sets permissions
       0004  Other read permission	    	r  Read permission
       0002  Other write permission	   	w  Write permission
       0001  Other execute permission	 	x  Execute permission   

     Symbolic representation allows for multiple changes to the same 
     setting group or groups and, when comma separated, to different 
     setting groups (see first and second examples).

     For a list of other permissions settings, read chmod(1).

EXAMPLES	chmod go+rx-w project.dir
		chmod u+x,g=rw,o-r report
		chmod 740 report

DOCUMENTATION	chmod(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chog

DESCRIPTION	The chog command changes the user and group IDs of each
		specified file to those of the named user.

SYNTAX		chog user file...
   
		  user    Login name of user whose IDs are to be applied.

		  file    Name of each file to be changed.

EXAMPLES	chog bill report program1

DOCUMENTATION	chog(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chown

DESCRIPTION	The chown command changes the user ID of each specified file 
		to that of the named user.

SYNTAX		chown user file...

		  user    Login name of user whose ID is to be applied.

		  file    Name of each file to be changed.

EXAMPLES	chown bill program1 program2 

DOCUMENTATION	chmod(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chroot

DESCRIPTION	The chroot command changes the root directory (/) to
		the specified directory and executes a new shell.

SYNTAX	  	chroot directory

		  directory   Name of the directory that is to become
			      the new root directory.

DOCUMENTATION   chroot(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-chsh

DESCRIPTION	The chsh command changes your login shell.

SYNTAX		chsh user [ shell ]

		  user    Login name of user whose shell is to be changed.

		  shell   Name of shell to be changed to.  If not specified,
			  changes to /bin/sh.

EXAMPLES	chsh bill /bin/csh
		chsh bill

DOCUMENTATION	chsh(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-clean

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS clean command removes all SCCS files in the 
		current directory that can be recreated.

SYNTAX		sccs clean

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-clear

DESCRIPTION	The clear command clears your terminal screen.

SYNTAX	  	clear

DOCUMENTATION   clear(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-clr

DESCRIPTION	The clr command clears your terminal screen.

SYNTAX	  	clr

DOCUMENTATION   clear(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual.
-cmp

DESCRIPTION	The cmp command compares data from two files.

SYNTAX		cmp [ options ] file1 file2

		  file1    Names of two files to be compared.  If - is 
		  file2    specified for file1, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> 
			   and compares this data with file2.

OPTIONS		-l   Displays differences in long format: byte address where 
		     differences (decimal) and data differences (octal).
		-s   Suppresses normal output and returns exit code only.
		     Returns 0 if files are identical, 1 if different, and
		     2 if an error occurred.

DOCUMENTATION	cmp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-col
	
DESCRIPTION	The col command processes line overlays and half-line feeds 
		in text data.

SYNTAX		col [ options ]

OPTIONS		-b   Specifies that output device does not have backspacing.
		-f   Suppresses moving half lines to next full line.
		-x   Suppresses conversion of white space to tabs.

DOCUMENTATION	col(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-comb

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS comb command combines delta versions of an SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs comb [ options ] file...

		  file  Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-c  Preserves specified deltas (-clist).  All other deltas
		    are discarded.
		-o  Causes reconstructed file to be accessed at release of
		    delta to be created.
		-p  Indicates oldest delta number (-p#) to preserve.
		-s  Generates additional shell script that, when executed, 
		    reports: file name, size (blocks) after combining, size
		    (blocks) of original, and percentage changed.

DOCUMENTATION	comb(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-comm
	
DESCRIPTION	The comm command compares data from two sorted files.

SYNTAX		comm [ options ] file1 file2

		  file1   Name of each file to be compared.  If - is 
		  file2   specified for either file1 or file2, reads 
			  stdin until <CTRL/D> and compares input with 
			  that from named file.

OPTIONS		-1   Suppresses column one: lines in file1 only.
		-2   Suppresses column two: lines in file2 only.
		-3   Suppresses column three: lines in file1 and file2.

EXAMPLES	comm -1 program1 program2
		comm -23 program1 program2

DOCUMENTATION	comm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cp

DESCRIPTION	The cp command copies file data to another file or directory.

SYNTAX		cp file1 file2
		cp file... directory

		  file1       Name of file whose data is to be copied and
		  file2       name given file into which data is copied.

		  file	      Name of each file to be copied to directory.

		  directory   Name of directory into which each file is copied.

EXAMPLES	cp /usr/bin/program mycopy
		cp program1 program2 program3 mydirectory

DOCUMENTATION	cp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cpio

DESCRIPTION	The cpio command copies files in and out of archive
		libraries.

SYNTAX	  	cpio option[key]

OPTIONS		-i   Copies in files that match the specified pattern
		     (next argument).  If the pattern is not specified,
		     copies in all files.
		-o   Reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and copies out the 
		     specified files.
		-p   Copies file into the specified directory (next
		     argument).

KEYS		B    Resets the access time of each copied file.  Can be
		     used with the -o and -p.
		S    Swaps half words while copying files in.  Used with
		     -i only.
		6    Indicates file is in UNIX 6th edition format. Used
		     with -i only.
		a    Updates the access time of each copied file.  Can 
		     be used with -o and -p.
		b    Swaps both bytes and half words while copying files
		     in.  Used with -i only.
		c    Creates header information in ASCII format.  Used
		     with -i and -o.
		d    Creates directories as needed.  Can be used with
		     -i and -o.
		f    Copies all files except those that match the 
		     specified pattern.  Used with -i only.
		l    Creates links wherever possible.  Used with -p 
		     only.
		m    Retains modification time for each copied file.  
		     Can be used with -i and -p.
		r    Interactively renames files.  Can be used with -i 
		     and -p.
		s    Swaps bytes while copying files in.  Used with
		     -i only.
		t    Displays the archive's table of contents or the 
		     files created.  Used with -i only.
		u    Copies files unconditionally.  Can be used with -i
		     and -p.
		v    Displays detailed (verbose) information as it 
		     copies and/or creates file.

DOCUMENTATION   cpio(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-create

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS create command creates new SCCS files.

SYNTAX		sccs create file...

		  file  Name of each SCCS file to be created.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-csh

DESCRIPTION	The csh command provides an interactive command interpreter
		that has a full subset of options, special characters, and
		control flow constructs.

SYNTAX		csh [ options ] [ arg... ]

		  arg   Name of each command to be executed and command
			options and arguments, if any.   If not specified,
			invokes csh for interactive execution.

OPTIONS		-V  Displays verbose information as input is read, even
		    before .cshrc file is read.
		-X  Display command sequence before execution, even before
		    .cshrc file is read.
       		-c  Reads commands from specified file (next argument).
		-e  Exits if any command terminates abnormally.
		-f  Invokes fast startup: does not read .cshrc file.
		-i  Invokes interactive shell (default).
		-n  Reads commands only: does not execute them.
		-s  Reads input from stdin.
		-t  Exits after one command.
		-v  Displays verbose information as input is read.
		-x  Display command sequence before execution.

DOCUMENTATION	csh(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An introduction to the C shell" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-csplit

DESCRIPTION	The csplit command splits the specified file into 
		smaller sized files.

SYNTAX	  	csplit [ options ] file arg...

		  file   Name of the file that is to be processed.  

		  arg    Each context pattern string that determines how
			 the file is to be split up.

OPTIONS		-f   Uses the specified string (-fstring) as a name 
		     prefix for all created files.  If not specified, 
		     uses xx prefix.
		-k   Does not remove all created files if an error 
		     occurs.  If not specified, removes all created 
		     files on error.
		-s   Suppresses all character count displays.  If not
		     specified, displays character count for each file
		     created.

DOCUMENTATION   csplit(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ctags

DESCRIPTION	The ctags command creates a tags file for the ex editor
		from the specified C, PASCAL, or FORTRAN source file.

SYNTAX	  	ctags [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-B   Uses backward pattern search.
		-F   Uses forward pattern search.
		-a   Appends information to an existing tags file.
		-t   Create typedef tags.
		-u   Updates the specified tags file.
		-v   Produces an index for the generated output.
		-w   Suppresses all diagnostic information.
		-x   Generates a cross reference listing.

DOCUMENTATION   ctags(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ctrace

DESCRIPTION	The ctrace command traces the statement-by-statement 
		execution of the specified C program.

SYNTAX	  	ctrace [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of the C program to be processed.  If not
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and 
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-P   Runs the preprocessor on input before tracing its
		     execution.
		-e   Prints variables in floating point.
		-f   Traces only the specified functions (next 
		     arguments).
		-l   Uses the specified number (next argument) as the 
		     number of consecutive statements to be checked for
		     loop tracing.  If not specified, checks 20.
		-o   Prints variables in octal format.
		-p   Changes the print function according to the 
		     specified prefix (next argument).
		-r   Uses the specified file (next argument) in place of
		     the runtime.c trace package.
		-s   Suppresses redundant trace output.
		-t   Traces the specified number (next argument) of 
		     variables per statement.  If not specified, traces 
		     10.
		-u   Prints variables in unsigned format.
		-v   Traces all but the specified functions (next 
		     arguments).
		-x   Prints variable in hexadecimal format.

DOCUMENTATION   ctrace(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cu

DESCRIPTION	The cu command allows you to call and connect to a remote 
		system.

SYNTAX		cu phone [ options ]

		   phone   Telephone number to be called.

OPTIONS		-#  Uses specified number (#) as communications line special
		    file.
        	-a  Uses specified special file (next argument) as ACU (auto
		    call unit).  If not specified, uses /dev/cua0.
		-l  Uses specified special file (next argument) as the
		    communications device.  If not specified, uses /dev/cu10.
		-s  Uses specified speed (next argument) as the baud rate.
		    If not specified, uses 300.
		-t  Dials out to terminal.

DOCUMENTATION	tip(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-cut

DESCRIPTION	The cut command deletes selected fields of each line 
		from the specified files.

SYNTAX	  	cut [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not 
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-c   Specifies the character positions to be cut out
		     (-clist).
		-d   Uses the specified character (-dx) as the field 
		     delimiter.  If not specified, uses a tab.
		-f   Specifies the fields (-flist) to be cut out. 
		-s   Suppresses all lines with no delimiter characters.
		     If not specified, lines with no delimiters are 
		     passed through untouched.  Used with the -f
		     option only.

DOCUMENTATION   cut(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-date
	
DESCRIPTION	The date command displays the current date and time.

SYNTAX		date [ -u ]

OPTIONS		-u   Displays time in GMT. 

EXAMPLES	date
		date -u

DOCUMENTATION	date(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-dc
	
DESCRIPTION	The dc command provides an interactive desktop calculator
		that has a full language subset.

SYNTAX		dc [ file ]

		  file   Name of file from which data is to be read.

DOCUMENTATION	dc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"DC--An Interactive Desk Calculator" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-dcat

DESCRIPTION	The dcat command concatenates the contents of the
		specified DECnet files.

SYNTAX	  	dcat [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each DECnet file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-d   Displays debugging information in Data Access 
		     Protocol (DAP) message trace format.
		-v   Displays the name of each DECnet file as processed.
		
DOCUMENTATION   dcat(1d) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		DECnet ULTRIX documentation
-dcp

DESCRIPTION	The dcp command copies the specified file to and from
		DECnet nodes.

SYNTAX	  	dcp [ options ] ifile ofile

		  ifile   Name of each DECnet input file specification.

		  ofile   Name of each DECnet output file specification.

OPTIONS		-A   Appends each input file to the specified output 
		     file.
		-P   Copies and displays the name of each output file 
		     on close.
		-S   Copies and executes each output file on the remote
		     system.
		-a   Copies each specified input file in ASCII mode.
		-d   Displays debugging information in Data Access 
		     Protocol (DAP) message trace format.
		-i   Copies each specified input file in image mode.
		-v   Displays the name of each DECnet file processed on
		     stderr.

DOCUMENTATION   dcp(1d) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		DECnet ULTRIX documentation
-dd
	
DESCRIPTION	The dd command copies and converts file data.

SYNTAX		dd [ keyword ]

KEYWORDS	if=     Name of input file.
		of=     Name of output file.
		ibs=    Sets input block size to # bytes.  If not specified, 
			defaults to 512.
		obs=    Sets output block size to # bytes.  If not specified, 
			defaults to 512.
		bs=     Sets input and output block size to # bytes.
			If specified, overrides ibs= and obs= keywords.
		cbs=    Sets conversion buffer size to # bytes.  Required with
			conv= keyword.
		skip=   Skips # records before copying.
		files=  Copies # files.
		seek=   Seeks to #th record on output file before copying.
		count=  Copies # input records.
		conv=   Converts data: ascii (EBCDIC to ASCII), ebcdic (ASCII
			to EBCDIC), ibm (ASCII to EBCDIC, for IBM print chain),
			lcase (alphabetics to lower case), ucase (alphabetics 
			to upper case), swap (swap every pair of bytes), 
			noerror (continue on error), and sync (pad input 
			records to input buffer size).

EXAMPLES	dd if=/dev/rht0 of=myfile ibs=800 cbs=80 conv=ascii,lcase

DOCUMENTATION	dd(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-deledit

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS deledit command, first, makes a new delta and, then,
		gets that delta for editing.

SYNTAX		sccs deledit file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-delget

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS delget command, first, makes a new delta and, then,
		get a copy of that delta.

SYNTAX		sccs delget file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-delta

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS delta command saves all changes made to an SCCS file
		by creating a new delta.

SYNTAX		sccs delta [ options ] file

		  file   Name of SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-g  Ignores specified list of deltas (-gstring).
		-m  Indicates the modification request number.
		-n  Does not delete edited file.
		-p  Displays differences before and after delta is applied.
		-r  Indicates new delta release number (-r#).
		-s  Suppresses all messages.
		-y  Creates delta with specified commentary (-ystring).

DOCUMENTATION	delta(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-deroff
	
DESCRIPTION	The deroff command removes eqn, nroff, tbl, and troff coding
		from each specified file.

SYNTAX		deroff [ -w ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-w   Produces word list (one word per line) in place of normal
		     output.

DOCUMENTATION	deroff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-diff

DESCRIPTION	The diff command displays text differences between files.

SYNTAX		diff [ options ] file1 file2

		  file1   Names of files whose differences are to be 
		  file2   displayed.  If - is specified for either file,
			  reads stdin until <CTRL/D> in place of that file.
			  Then, it displays differences between named file 
			  and this input.  If a directory is specified for 
			  either file, uses file in that directory with
			  same name as named file.  Then, it displays 
			  differences in their data.

OPTIONS		-D   Uses specified string (-Dstring) and creates merged 
		     version of file1 and file2.
		-S   Beginning with the specified file (next argument)
		     compares the files in the current directory.
       		-b   Ignores all trailing blanks.
		-c   Displays specified number of context lines (-c#) 
		     with each output line.  If number is not specified,
		     displays three context lines.
		-e   Writes output to ed script.
		-f   Writes output to script, but in the reverse order.
		-h   Makes hasty (quick) comparison.
		-l   Displays output in long format.
		-r   Recursively checks all files in common subdirectories.
		-s   Displays names of files that are the same.

DOCUMENTATION	diff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-diff3

DESCRIPTION	The diff3 command compares the data in three specified 
		files.

SYNTAX	  	diff3 [ options ] file1 file2 file3

		  file1   Name of each file to be processed.
		  file2
		  file3

OPTIONS		-3   Produces an ed editor script containing the changes
		     between file1 and file2 that are to be incorporated
		     into file3.
		-e   Produces an ed editor script containing the changes
		     between file2 and file3 that are to be incorporated
		     into file1.
		-x   Produces an ed editor script containing the changes
		     between all three files.
		
DOCUMENTATION   diff3(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-dlogin

DESCRIPTION	The dlogin command allows you to log in to a remote 
		DECnet host node.

SYNTAX	  	dlogin node [ options ]

		  node   Name of the remote DECnet host node.

OPTIONS		-e   Uses the specified character (next argument) as the
		     dlogin escape character.  If not specified, uses ~
		     as the escape character.
		-l   Uses the specified file (next argument) as the
		     logfile for this session.
		
DOCUMENTATION   dlogin(1d) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		DECnet ULTRIX documentation
-dls

DESCRIPTION	The dls command lists the contents of or generates 
		statistics for the specified DECnet directory or file.

SYNTAX	  	dls [ options ] file

		  file   File specification for the remote DECnet 
			 directory or file.

OPTIONS		-C   Lists the directory contents in multicolumn format.
		-1   Lists the directory contents in single column 
		     format.
		-a   Lists all files including . and .. in an ULTRIX
		     directory.
		-d   Displays debugging information in Data Access
		     Protocol (DAP) message trace format.
		-l   Displays statistics for the contents of the DECnet
		     directory in long format.

DOCUMENTATION   dls(1d) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		DECnet ULTRIX documentation
-drm

DESCRIPTION	The drm command removes the specified file from a remote
		DECnet directory.

SYNTAX	  	drm [ -d ] file

		  file   File specification for the remote DECnet file.

OPTIONS		-d   Displays debugging information in Data Access
		     Protocol (DAP) message trace format.

DOCUMENTATION   drm(1d) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		DECnet ULTRIX documentation
-du
	
DESCRIPTION	The du command displays the amount of disk usage for each
		specified directory or file.

SYNTAX		du [ options ] [ name... ]

		  name   Name of each directory or file for which usage 
			 summary is generated.  If not specified, uses 
			 current directory.

OPTIONS		-a    Displays disk usage for all files.
		-s    Displays only summary total.

DOCUMENTATION	du(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-echo
	
DESCRIPTION	The echo command writes each specified argument to stdout.

SYNTAX		echo [ -n ] [ string... ]

		  string   Each argument to be written to stdout.  The echo 
			   command separates all arguments with blanks and 
			   terminates string with a newline.

OPTIONS		-n   Suppresses newlines from output.

DOCUMENTATION	echo(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ed
	
DESCRIPTION	The ed command provides an interactive, line-oriented editor 
		that has a full subset of commands.

SYNTAX		ed [ - ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of file to be edited.  The ed command edits 
			 a copy of the named file and update source file only
			 when the write command (w) is invoked.  If not 
			 specified, edits unnamed temporary file.

OPTIONS		-   Suppresses all character count displays.  Normally, ed
		    displays a character count when invoked, whenever
		    you edit another file (e), read in data from another
		    file (r), or write out to file (w).

DOCUMENTATION	ed(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Tutorial Introduction to the UNIX Text Editor" and "Advanced
		Editing on UNIX" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, 
		Volume 1
-edit

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS edit command gets an SCCS file for editing.

SYNTAX		sccs edit [ options ] file

		  file  Name of the SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-b  Creates a branch.
		-i  Includes specified list of deltas (-istring).
		-r  Indicates delta number (-r#) to get for editing.
		-x  Excludes specified list of deltas (-xstring).

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-egrep
	
DESCRIPTION	The egrep command performs a fast search of each specified file
		for the designated extended expression.

SYNTAX		egrep [ options ] [ string ] [ file... ]
  
		  string   Pattern to be searched for.

		  file     Name of each file to be searched.

OPTIONS		-b   Precedes each output line with its block number.
		-c   Produces count of matching lines only.
		-e   Uses specified expression (next argument) that begins with
		     minus (-).
		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) for input of regular 
		     expression.
		-h   Suppresses file name headers from output.
		-l   Lists files and matching lines only once, separated by 
		     newline.
		-n   Precedes each matching line with its line number.
		-s   Suppresses output and displays return code only: 0, if
		     match found; 1, if none; 2, if error occurred.
		-v   Displays all lines that do not match specified expression.

DOCUMENTATION	grep(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-eqn
	
DESCRIPTION	The eqn command provides a formatter for mathematic equations.

SYNTAX		eqn [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-d   Sets text delimiters to specified characters (-dxy).
		     Both delimiters can be set to same character. 
		-f   Sets font to specified font number (-f#).
		-p   Reduces point size by the specified points (-p#).
		-s   Sets equation size to specified number (-s#). 

DOCUMENTATION	eqn(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Typesetting Mathematics--User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-error

DESCRIPTION	The error command analyzes and disperses compiler and 
		processor error messages back into the source file.

SYNTAX	  	error [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of the source file to be processed.  If 
			 not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-I   Ignores the functions listed in the specified file
		     (next argument).
		-n   Displays error messages at stderr but does not 
		     merge them back into the source file.
		-q   Prompts before touching the source file.
		-s   Displays statistics for each error type.
		-t   Does not touch those files that match the specified
		     suffix (next argument).
		-v   Invokes the vi editor on each file that had been 
		     touched.
		
DOCUMENTATION   error(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ex

DESCRIPTION	The ex command provides an interactive, line-oriented editor 
		that has a display feature and a full subset of commands.

SYNTAX		ex [ options ] [ +cmd ] file...

		  +cmd   Starts edit session with specified command (cmd).

		  file   Name of each file to be edited.  If more than one
			 file is specified, edits each file in succession. 
			 For further information, read about the :n command 
			 in the ex manual page.

OPTIONS		-   Suppresses all character count displays.  Normally, ex
		    displays a character count upon being invoked, whenever
		    you edit another file (e), read-in data from another
		    file (r), or write out to a file (w).
		-l  Sets up edit session for LISP.
		-r  Recovers edit session lost during a system crash.
		-t  Searches file for and begins session at occurrence of
		    specified string (next argument).
		-v  Invokes full-screen text display (equivalent to vi editor).

DOCUMENTATION	ex(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Ex Reference Manual" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, 
		Volume 1
-expand

DESCRIPTION	The expand command expands all tabs in each specified 
		file to spaces.

SYNTAX	  	expand [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not 
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-#   Sets tab stops the specified number of spaces (#)
		     apart.  If more than one number is specified (comma
		     separated), sets them at the specified columns.

DOCUMENTATION   expand(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-expr
	
DESCRIPTION	The expr command evaluates each specified expression.

SYNTAX		expr expression...

		  expression   Name of each expression to be evaluated. 
			       For list of expressions, read the expr 
			       manual page.

DOCUMENTATION	expr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-f

DESCRIPTION	The f command displays information about all users 
		that are currently logged on the system.

SYNTAX		f

DOCUMENTATION	finger(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-f77

DESCRIPTION	The f77 command compiles and links FORTRAN 77 programs.

SYNTAX	  	f77 [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each FORTRAN 77 source file to be 
			 processed.

OPTIONS		-C   Runs the compiler and checks that all subscripts 
		     are within declared boundaries.
		-E   Uses specified character (-Ex) as the EFL option.
		-F   Runs the EFL and Ratfor preprocessors only.
		-N   Uses specified key and numbers (-N[key]nnn) to 
		     change the static compiler tables.  The keys are:
			c   Maximum depth for control statements.  The
			    default is 20.
			n   Maximum number of identifiers.  The default
			    is 401.
			q   Maximum number of equivalenced variables.  
			    The default is 150.
			s   Maximum number of statement numbers.  The
			    default is 201.
			x   Maximum number of external names.  The
			    default is 200.
		-O   Uses the object code optimizer (/lib/c2).
		-R   Uses the specified string (-Rstring) for a Ratfor
		     option.
		-S   Compiles files and writes output to .s files.
		-T   Uses specified key and name (-T[key]name) as 
		     substitute compiler pass.  The keys are:
			F   Substitutes named file for /lib/crt0.
			M   Substitutes named file for /usr/bin/m4.
			1   Substitutes named file for /usr/c/oc1.
			2   Substitutes named file for /usr/c/oc2.
			a   Substitutes named file for /bin/as.
			l   Substitutes named file for /bin/ld.
		-V   Generates code suitable for overlaid programs.
		-c   Suppresses loading and produces .o files.
		-f   Uses the floating point interpreter.
		-m   Uses the m4 preprocessor.
		-o   Write output to the specified file (next
		     argument).
		-onetrip   Compiles do loops that are used only once.
		-p   Displays count of times each routine is called.
		-u   Makes default variable type "undefined".

DOCUMENTATION   f77(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Portable Fortran 77 Compiler" in the ULTRIX-11
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-factor
	
DESCRIPTION	The factor command factors the specified number.

SYNTAX		factor [ num ]

		  num   Number to be factored.  If not specified, reads 
			stdin until number is typed and displays its prime 
			factors.

EXAMPLES	factor 36

DOCUMENTATION	factor(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-false
	
DESCRIPTION	The false command forces an unsuccessful exit status.

SYNTAX		false

DOCUMENTATION	true(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-fgrep
	
DESCRIPTION	The fgrep command performs a fast, compact search of each 
		specified file for the designated fixed pattern.

SYNTAX		fgrep [ options ] [ string ] [ file... ]
  
		  string   Pattern to be searched for.

		  file     Name of each file to be searched.

OPTIONS		-b   Precedes each output line with its block number.
		-c   Produces count of matching lines only.
		-e   Uses specified expression (next argument) that begins with
		     minus (-).
		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) for input of regular 
		     expression.
		-h   Suppresses file name headers from output.
		-l   Lists files and matching lines only once, separated by 
		     newline.
		-n   Precedes each matching line with its line number.
		-s   Suppresses output and displays return code only: 0, if
		     match found; 1, if none; 2, if error occurred.
		-v   Displays all lines that do not match specified expression.
		-x   Displays only lines that match in their entirety.

DOCUMENTATION	grep(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-file
	
DESCRIPTION	The file command attempts to determine the file type of each 
		specified file.

SYNTAX		file file... 

		  file   Name of each file whose data type is to be determined.

DOCUMENTATION	file(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-find
	
DESCRIPTION	The find command attempts to locate each specified file.

SYNTAX		find path expression

		  path    Pathname of directories to be searched for files 
			  that match specified expression.

EXPRESSIONS	-atime   Tests if file has been accessed in specified number
			 of days (next argument).
		-exec    Tests true if specified command (next argument) 
			 returns a 0 on exit.
		-group   Tests if group ID matches specified group name (next
			 argument).
		-inum    Tests if file has specified inode number (next 
			 argument).
		-links   Tests if file has specified number of links (next 
			 argument).
		-mtime   Tests if file has been modified in specified number 
			 of days (next argument).
		-name    Tests if file has specified name (next argument).
		-newer   Tests if file has been modified more recently than
			 the specified file (next argument).
		-ok      Executes the specified command (next argument) and
			 displays output to stdout.
		-perm    Tests if file has specified (octal) mode (next 
			 argument).
		-print   Prints current pathname.
		-size    Tests if file has specified number of blocks (next 
			 argument).
		-type    Tests if file is specified type (next argument).
		-user    Tests if file owner is specified user (next argument).

DOCUMENTATION	find(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-finger
	
DESCRIPTION	The finger command displays personal information about 
		each user who has an account on the system.

SYNTAX		finger [ options ] [ user... ]

		  user    Login name of each user whose finger information is
			  to be displayed.  If not specified, displays summary 
			  list for all users currently logged in.

OPTIONS		-b   Uses slightly briefer display.
		-f   Suppresses normal header.
		-h   Suppresses project information (.project) from display.
		-i   Displays quick list that includes all idle time.
		-l   Displays output in long format.
		-p   Suppresses plan information (.plan) from display.
		-q   Displays a quick list only.
		-s   Displays output in short format.
		-w   Displays output in narrow format.

EXAMPLES	finger
		finger bill jones mary
		finger -q 

DOCUMENTATION	finger(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-fix

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS fix command removes the current delta and gets the 
		earlier delta for edit.

SYNTAX		sccs fix file...

		  file  Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-fmt

DESCRIPTION	The fmt command formats text into single column
		paragraphs.

SYNTAX	  	fmt [ file ]

		  file   Name of the file to be processed.  If not
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

DOCUMENTATION   fmt(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-from
	
DESCRIPTION	The from command displays whom your mail is from.

SYNTAX		from [ options ]

OPTIONS		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) instead of your
		     normal mail file.  If this option is used, but file 
		     argument is not specified, reads your mbox file.
		-s   Determines if any new mail from specified user (next 
		     argument).

EXAMPLES	from 
		from -f 
		from -f -s mary
  
DOCUMENTATION	from(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ftp

DESCRIPTION	The ftp command provides an interactive, user interface
		to the ARPANET standard File Transfer Protocol.

SYNTAX	  	ftp [ options ] [ system ]

		  system   Name of the destination system.  If not 
			   specified, uses the system named by the
			   subcommand.

OPTIONS		-d   Enables debugging.
		-g   Disables file name expansion.
		-i   Disables prompting during multiple file transfers.
		-n   Disables autologin during an initial connection.
		-v   Displays all responses from the remote server as
		     well as all data transfer statistics.
		
DOCUMENTATION   ftp(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-get

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS get command gets a copy of an SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs get [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-a  Retrieves the specified delta sequence number (-a#).
		-b  Gets delta from new branch.  Must be used with -e option.
		-c  Does not apply to deltas created after specified date
		    (-cdate).
		-e  Gets specified delta version for edit.
		-g  Suppresses getting text from delta.
		-i  Includes specified list of deltas (-istring).
		-k  Does not expand ID keywords.
		-l  Writes delta summary to l-file.  If optional p key is also
		    specified (-lp), writes delta summary to stdout only.
		-m  Precedes each text line with delta version number.
		-n  Precedes each text line with identification keyword.
		-p  Writes text to stdout.
		-r  Indicates specified delta version number (-r#).
		-s  Suppresses all messages.
		-t  Gets most recently created (top) delta.
		-x  Excludes specified list of deltas (-xstring).

DOCUMENTATION	get(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-getopt

DESCRIPTION	The getopt command parses and checks options that are
		specified on the command line.

SYNTAX	  	set - `getopt string $*`

		  string   Alphanumeric list of option letters.

DOCUMENTATION   getopt(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-graph
	
DESCRIPTION	The graph command draws a graph from the specified options.

SYNTAX		graph [ options ] 

OPTIONS		-a   Supplies abcissas automatically (not in input) and uses
		     next two arguments to set spacing and starting point.
		-b   Breaks graph after each label in input.
		-c   Uses specified string (next argument) as label.
		-g   Uses specified number (next argument) in setting up grid
		     style: 0 (no grid), 1 (frame with ticks), and 3 (full 
		     grid).  If not specified, uses 3.
		-h   Uses specified number (next argument) as fraction of space
		     for height.
		-l   Uses specified string (next argument) as graph label.
		-m   Uses specified number (next argument) in setting up line
		     mode: 0 (disconnected) and 1 (connected).  If not 
		     specified, uses 1.
		-r   Uses specified number (next argument) as fraction of space
		     to right before plotting.
		-s   Saves screen (no erase) before plotting.
		-t   Transposes vertical and horizontal axises.
		-u   Uses specified number (next argument) as fraction of space
		     up before plotting.
		-w   Uses specified number (next argument) as fraction of space
		     for width.
		-x   Determines x axis logarithmically.
		-y   Determines y axis logarithmically.

DOCUMENTATION	graph(1g) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-greek

DESCRIPTION	The greek command provides a filter that re-interprets
		all characters typed at your terminal to an extended
		character set.

SYNTAX	  	greek [ option ]

OPTIONS		-T   Uses the specified name (next argument) as the 
		     terminal type.
		
DOCUMENTATION   greek(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-grep
	
DESCRIPTION	The grep command searches each specified file for the 
		designated regular expression.

SYNTAX		grep [ options ] string [ file... ]
  
		  string   Pattern to be searched for. Patterns are limited 
			   to regular expressions.

		  file     Name of each file to be searched.

OPTIONS		-b   Precedes each output line with its block number.
		-c   Produces count of matching lines only.
		-e   Uses specified expression (next argument) that begins with
		     minus (-).
		-h   Suppresses file name headers from output.
		-l   Lists files and matching lines only once, separated by 
		     newline.
		-n   Precedes each matching line with its line number.
		-s   Suppresses output and display return code only: 0, if
		     match found; 1, if none; 2, if error occurred.
		-v   Displays all lines that do not match specified expression.
		-y   Matches lowercase letters with uppercase.

DOCUMENTATION	grep(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-help
	
DESCRIPTION	The help command displays on-line help information.

SYNTAX		help [ arg... ]

		  arg   Menu, command, term, file, or kernel error 
			message for which you want help information 
			displayed.  If not specified, displays help 
			welcome menu.

DOCUMENTATION	help(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		ULTRIX-11 Help Facility Overview
-hostid

DESCRIPTION	The hostid command displays the name of your current
		host system.

SYNTAX	  	hostid

DOCUMENTATION   hostid(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-hostname
	
DESCRIPTION	The hostname command displays your system's name.

SYNTAX		hostname

DOCUMENTATION	hostname(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-info

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS info command displays information about those SCCS 
		files currently being edited.

SYNTAX		sccs info [ options ]

OPTIONS		-b  Ignores branches.
		-u  Displays information for SCCS files edited by specified 
		    user only (-uname).

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-ipcrm

DESCRIPTION	The ipcrm command removes the specified interprocess
		communication identifier.

SYNTAX	  	ipcrm [ options ]

OPTIONS		-Q   Removes the message queue identifier specified
		     by message key (next argument).
		-S   Removes the message queue identifier specified
		     by semaphore key (next argument).
		-q   Removes the specified message queue identifier
		     (next argument).
		-s   Removes the specified semaphore queue identifier
		     (next argument).

DOCUMENTATION   ipcrm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ipcs

DESCRIPTION	The ipcs command displays the status information for
		the current interprocess facilities.

SYNTAX	  	ipcs [ options ]

OPTIONS		-C   Uses the specified core file (next argument) in
		     place of /dev/kmem.
		-N   Uses the specified namelist (next argument) in
		     place of /unix.
		-a   Uses all display options (shorthand for -b, -c,
		     -o, -p, and -t).
		-b   Displays the biggest allowable size information
		     (maximum bytes in message and semaphores).
		-c   Displays creator's login and group names.
		-o   Displays the outstanding usage information
		     (number of messages in queue and size of each).
		-p   Displays the process ID information (last process
		     to send and first process to receive).
		-q   Displays information about active message queues.
		-s   Displays information about active semaphore queues.
		-t   Displays all time statistics.

DOCUMENTATION   ipcs(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-join

DESCRIPTION	The join command joins the data from two specified files.

SYNTAX		join [ options ] file1 file2

		  file1   Names of files whose data is to be joined.
		  file2   

OPTIONS		-a   Produces additional line for unpaired lines from 
		     specified file (-an).
		-e   Uses specified replacement string (next argument)
		     for all empty output fields (-e string).
		-j   Joins mth field in nth file (-jn m).
		-o   Uses specified list of fields (next argument) for
		     output lines (-o n.m).
		-t   Sets tab character (-tc).

DOCUMENTATION	join(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-kill
	
DESCRIPTION	The kill command sends a signal to the specified process.

SYNTAX		kill [ -signal ] pid...

		  pid     Process ID number of each process to receive signal.

SIGNALS		Signal number to be sent.  If not specified, sends signal 15 
		(terminate).  The signal most frequently sent is 9 (kill). 
		Other signals sent by users are:

		     1   Hangup (SIGHUP)
		     2   Interrupt (SIGINT)
		     3   Quit (SIGQUIT)
		     4   Illegal instruction (SIGILL)
		     5   Trace trap (SIGTRAP)
		     6   IOT instruction (SIGIOT)
		     7   EMT instruction (SIGEMT)
		     8   Floating point exception (SIGFPE)
		     9   Kill process (SIGKILL)
		     10  Bus error (SIGBUS)
		     11  Segmentation violation (SIGSEGV)
		     12  Bad system call (SIGSYS)
		     13  Write to pipe with no one to read (SIGPIPE)
		     14  Alarm clock (SIGALRM)
		     15  Software termination (SIGTERM)
		     30  User-defined signal 1 (SIGUSR1)
		     31  User-defined signal 2 (SIGUSR2)

EXAMPLES	kill -9 12989

DOCUMENTATION	kill(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-l11

DESCRIPTION	The l11 command is the Macro-11 loader.

SYNTAX	  	l11 [ option ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to processed.

OPTIONS		-    Suppresses all normal diagnostic messages.
		-K   Precedes all global symbols with an underscore (_).
		-c   Writes output to .o files.
		-go  Preserves external symbols only in the output 
		     symbol table (excludes all nongobal symbols).
		-i   Creates an output file with text and data in 
		     separate address space.
		-lp  Prints the load map at the line printer.
		-mp  Displays the load map at your terminal.
		-n   Creates output file so text and data are shared
		     and readonly.
		-no  Runs pass1 and exits (does not create output file).
		-ns  Strips symbol table and relocation bits from output
		     file.
		-r   Generates relocation bits in output file.
		-v   Displays detailed (verbose) diagnostic information.

DOCUMENTATION   l11(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-last

DESCRIPTION	The last command displays the last login times for
		each specified user.

SYNTAX	  	last [ options ] [ user... ] [ tty... ]

		  user   Login name of each user for which information
			 is to be specified.  If not specified, displays
			 all login records.

		  tty    Name of each tty for which the information is
			 to be restricted.  If not specified, displays
			 information for all terminals.

OPTIONS		-#   Limits the number of output lines to the specified
		     number (#).
		
DOCUMENTATION   last(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ld
	
DESCRIPTION	The ld command loads (combines) compiled C modules into one
		executable program.

SYNTAX		ld [ options ] file...

		 file    Name of each compiled C program module to be 
			 combined into one executable program.

OPTIONS		-D   Uses specified number (next argument) as size of data 
		     segment.
		-L   Marks end of all overlays.
		-O   Loads overlaid file.
		-X   Saves local symbols but those beginning with capital L.
		-Z   Marks beginning of all overlays.
		-d   Forces definition of common storage.
		-e   Uses specified location (next argument) as entry point.
		-i   Sets up separate instruction and data address space (data
		     starts at location 0).
		-l   Searches specified path (-lpath) for library.
		-n   Loads text segment as read only (shared text).
		-o   Uses specified file (next argument) as output file.  If 
		     not specified, uses a.out.
		-r   Generates relocation bits for another loader run.
		-s   Strips symbol table and relocation bits from output.
		-u   Enters specified symbol (next argument) in symbol table. 
		-x   Enters only external symbols in symbol table.

DOCUMENTATION	ld(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-learn

DESCRIPTION	The learn command provides computer-aided instruction about
		your ULTRIX-11 system.

SYNTAX		learn [ -directory ] [ subject [ lesson [ speed ] ] ] 

		  -directory  Runs script from specified directory.

		  subject     Subject about which you want instruction. 
			      CAI exists for: editor, eqn, files, macros, 
			      morefiles, and C.  If not specified, prompts
			      you for desired subject.

		  lesson      Last lesson number.  If specified, learn resumes 
			      with the next lesson.

		  speed       Level of difficulty.
			    
DOCUMENTATION	learn(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"LEARN--Computer-Aided Instruction on UNIX" in the ULTRIX-11
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-lex
	
DESCRIPTION	The lex command generates programs that are to be used for
		lexically analyzing text files.

SYNTAX		lex [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file that contains a regular expression
			 and its corresponding actions.  If not specified, 
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses this as input.

OPTIONS		-f   Runs a faster compilation (does not pack resulting 
		     tables).
		-n   Prints no summary information (default option).
		-t   Writes output to stdout instead of a source file.
		-v   Prints one line summary of generated statistics.

DOCUMENTATION	lex(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Lex--A Lexical Analyzer Generator in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-line

DESCRIPTION	The line command reads one line from stdin and writes it
		to stdout.

SYNTAX	  	line

DOCUMENTATION   line(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-lint
	
DESCRIPTION	The lint program checks C programs.

SYNTAX		lint [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each C program to be checked.

OPTIONS		-a   Reports assignments of long values to integer variables.
		-b   Reports break statements that cannot be reached.
		-c   Reports casts which have questionable portability.
		-h   Applies heuristic tests to detect bugs, improve style,
		     and reduce waste.
		-n   Does not check compatibility with standard library.
		-p   Checks portability to IBM and GCOS dialects of C.
		-u   Ignores all used functions and variables that are 
		     not defined or all defined functions and variables that 
		     are not used.
		-v   Ignores all unused arguments in functions.
		-x   Reports all external variables that are not used.

DOCUMENTATION	lint(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Lint, a C Program Checker" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-ln
	
DESCRIPTION	The ln command creates a new directory entry (link) to an 
		existing file.

SYNTAX		ln [ options ] file1 [ file2 ]

		  file1   Name of existing file and name given to new 
		  file2   directory entry (link).  If not specified, uses 
			  name of existing file.

OPTIONS		-f    Forces a link to an existing directory.  This option is
		      restricted to use by the superuser only.
		-s    Creates a symbolic link.

EXAMPLES	ln /staff/fred/bin/program1 mycopy
		ln program1 /staff/dave/bin/mycopy
 
DOCUMENTATION	ln(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-login
	
DESCRIPTION	The login command allows you to log in to an ULTRIX-11 system.
		Normally, the login command is automatically invoked at your
		terminal during multiuser startup.

SYNTAX		login [ user ]

		  user   Login name of user.  If not specified, prompts for 
			 user name.  

DOCUMENTATION	login(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-look
	
DESCRIPTION	The look command finds lines in sorted data that begin with 
		the specified pattern.
		

SYNTAX		look [ options ] string [ file ]

		  string   Pattern to be searched for.

		  file     Name of file to be searched.  If not specified, 
			   uses /usr/dict/words with the -df options.

OPTIONS		-d   Uses dictionary order: letters, digits, tabs, and blanks. 
		-f   Folds upper case to lower case (compares equally).

DOCUMENTATION	look(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-lookbib

DESCRIPTION	The lookbib command reads stdin until a <CTRL/D> for
		keywords and searches the bibliography database for
		all references to the specified keywords.

SYNTAX		lookbib [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be searched.  If not
			 specified, searches /usr/dict/papers.

DOCUMENTATION	refer(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Guide
-lorder
	
DESCRIPTION	The lorder command finds the ordering relationships between
		object files or library archive files.

SYNTAX		lorder file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed. 

DOCUMENTATION	lorder(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-lpq
	
DESCRIPTION	The lpq command displays the status of the line printer queue.

SYNTAX		lpq [ options ] [ job... ] [ user... ]

		  job   Number of each job for which status information is 
			displayed.

		  user  Login name of each user for whom status information is
			to be displayed.

OPTIONS		-P   Displays status for specified printer queue (-Pprinter).
		-l   Displays queue status in long format.
 
EXAMPLES	lpq
		lpq -Plp2 bill

DOCUMENTATION	lpq(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-lpr
	
DESCRIPTION	The lpr command submits jobs to the line printer queue.

SYNTAX		lpr [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be submitted.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and submits this input.

OPTIONS		-C   Prints file with specified hostname in header (-Cname).
		-J   Prints each file with specified header name (-Jname)
		     instead file name on header.
		-P   Submits file to specified printer queue (-Pprinter).
		-##  Prints the specified number of copies (for example,
		     -#3).
		-c   Copies each file before submitting it to print queue.
		-h   Prints each file with specified header name (-hname)
		     instead of its file name.
		-i   Indents printout specified number of spaces (-i#).
		     If number is not specified, defaults to 8.
		-m   Mails a job completion message.
		-p   Paginates printout. 
		-r   Removes each file after submitting it to printer queue.

DOCUMENTATION	lpr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-lprm
	
DESCRIPTION	The lprm command removes jobs submitted to the printer queue.

SYNTAX		lprm  [ options ] [ job... ] [ user... ] 

		  job   Number of each job that is to be removed.

		  user  Login name of each user whose jobs are to be removed.

OPTIONS		-    Removes all jobs owned by you only.
		-P   Removes jobs from specified printer queue (-Pprinter).
 
EXAMPLES	lprm
		lprm -Plp2 bill
		lprm 438

DOCUMENTATION	lprm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ls
	
DESCRIPTION	The ls command lists and generates statistics on files.

SYNTAX		ls [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each directory or file for which a list 
			 and/or statistics are to be generated.  If not 
			 specified, lists and/or generates statistics for 
			 all files in your current directory.

OPTIONS		-C   Forces multicolumn output for a pipe or filter.
		-F   Marks directories with slash (/) and executable files with
		     an asterisk (*). 
		-R   Recursively lists all subdirectories.
		-1   Displays one entry per line.
		-a   Displays all entries (including those beginning with
		     a period (.).
		-b   Displays nonprintable characters as \nnn (octal).
		-c   Sorts entries by time of creation, not by name.
		-d   Displays names of directories only, not contents.
		-f   Displays names in the order they exist in directory.
		-g   Displays group ID, not owner ID (used with -l only).
		-i   Displays corresponding inumbers (column 1) for all files.
		-l   Displays file statistics: mode (permissions), link count,
		     owner, size (bytes), and time last modified.
		-m   Forces stream output, not multicolumn format.
		-q   Displays nonprintable characters as a question mark (?).
		-r   Sorts entries in reverse alphabetic or time order.
		-s   Displays size in blocks (including indirect blocks).
		-t   Sorts by time modified (latest first), not by name.
		-u   Sorts by time last accessed (latest first), not by name.
		-x   Forces sorted columnar printing (usually one column/page).

DOCUMENTATION	ls(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ltf

DESCRIPTION	The ltf command (Labeled Tape Facility) reads and writes
		Versions 3 and 4 ANSI-compatible tape volumes.

SYNTAX		ltf option[keys] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-c   Creates a new tape volume.
		-t   Lists the names of each file on the volume.
		-x   Extracts each named file from the volume.

KEYS		B    Uses the specified number (next argument) as
		     the blocking factor on write operations.  If not 
		     specified, sets the blocking factor to 2048-bytes
		     (maximum allowed).
		I    Reads the file names to be processed from the 
		     specified file (next argument).  If - is specified
		     as the file, reads stdin and prompts for all 
		     required information.
		L    Uses the specified six characters (next argument) 
		     as the volume label.
		O    Omits headers the optional headers HDR3-HDR9.
		P    Positions the volume at the specified file sequence
		     and section number (next argument) before beginning
		     the requested action (-t and -x options only).
		R    Uses the specified number (next argument) as the 
		     the volume record length.  If not specified, sets
		     record length to 512-bytes.
		V    Displays verbose information about directories
		     as well as files on the volume.
		0-9  Uses the specified tape unit number.  Can be used
		     g, k, and n keys.
		a    Creates the volume in Version 3 ANSI-compatible
		     format.  If not specified, uses Version 4 format.
		f    Uses the specified special file (next argument)
		     as the tape device name.  If not specified, uses
		     /dev/rht0.
		g    Specifies 6250 GCR tape.
		h    Writes all files that are pointed to be a symbolic
		     link to the volume in place of recreating each 
		     symbolic link on the volume.
		k    Specifies TK50 tape cartridge.
		n    Specifies 800 bpi tape.
		o    Omits directory blocks from the volume.
		p    Restores each file with its original mode, owner
		     (user ID), and group ID.  Can be used with the
		     -x option and by the superuser only.
		v    Displays verbose information about files on the
		     volume only.
		w    Displays a warning if, when creating a volume (-c),
		     a file is in danger of being truncated or, when 
		     extracting a file (-x), a file is in danger of 
		     being overwritten.

EXAMPLES	ltf -cfB /dev/rht1 100 file...

DOCUMENTATION	ltf(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-m11

DESCRIPTION	The m11 command is the Macro-11 assembler.

SYNTAX	  	m11 [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be assembled.

OPTIONS		-cr  Generates a cross reference list from the specified
		     keys(-cr:keys).  The keys consist of a colon 
		     separated list from: sym (user-defined symbols),
		     mac (macro names), per (permanent symbols), pse 
		     (psect names), err (errors), and reg (registers).
		-da  Redefines default .asect attributes to specified 
		     string (-da:string).
		-de  Mimics DEC Macro-11 assembly.
		-dp  Redefines either default .psect attributes and
		     unnamed .csect from specified string (-dp:string)
		     or default named .csect attribute (-dp:c).
		-ds  Simulates an initial .dsbl directive from the 
		     specified string (-ds:string).
		-en  Simulates an initial .enabl directive from the
		     specified string (-en:string).
		-fl  Produces a listing in structured format.
		-ha  Mimics Harvard Macro-11 assembly.
		-l0  Generates an error when PDP-11 instruction set does
		     not contain the op code.
		-li  Simulates an initial .list directive from the 
		     specified string (-li:string).
		-lp  Spools assembly listing for printing. 
		-ls  Generates assembly listing and writes it to .lst 
		     file.
		-lt  Generates an assembly listing and writes it to 
		     stdout.
		-my  Generates a listing as it appears after macro 
		     expansion but excludes macro calls, conditional 
		     directives, and so on.
		-mx  Same as -my option but includes macro calls, 
		     conditional directives, and so on.
		-na  Uses specified name (-na:name) for output file.
		-nl  Simulates an initial .nlist directive from the
		     specified string (-nl:string).
		-no  Checks syntax and listing but does not produce
		     the object file.
		-ns  Does not include the symbol table in the object 
		     file.
		-sx  Includes local symbols in the symbol table.
		-u   Treats form feeds as spaces.
		-uc  Simulates an initial .dsabl directive.
		-um  Converts all macro definitions to upper case.
		-xs  Generates the symbol table and macro storage with 
		     the specified K words size (-xs:nn).
		-xx  Displays debugging information.

DOCUMENTATION   m11(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-m4

DESCRIPTION	The m4 command is a macro preprocessor for C, Ratfor, 
		and other languages.

SYNTAX	  	m4 [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not 
			 specified, or if - is specified in file list,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this
			 input.
		
DOCUMENTATION   m4(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"The M4 Processor" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents,
		Volume 2
-mail
	
DESCRIPTION	The mail command provides an interactive program with a full
		subset of commands for sending or reading mail messages.

SYNTAX		mail [ options ] [ user... ]

		  user   Login name of each user to which the message is sent.
			 If not specified, reads your mail account for messages.

OPTIONS		-f   Checks specified file (next argument) instead of your 
		     normal account for mail.
		-i   Ignores all tty-generated interrupt signals.
		-n   Ignores /usr/lib/Mail.rc during startup.
		-s   Uses specified subject (next argument) for header. 
		-u   Checks specified user's (next argument) account for mail.
		-v   Displays verbose delivery information.

DOCUMENTATION	mail(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"MAIL REFERENCE MANUAL" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 1
-make

DESCRIPTION	The make command updates program groups. 

SYNTAX		make [ options ] file...

OPTIONS		-b   Runs in compatibility mode for old makefiles.
		-d   Displays detailed information about file and times
		     examined (debug mode).
		-e   Overrides makefile assignments with environment variables.
		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) as input.  If not 
		     specified, uses makefile and Makefile, respectively,
		     in current directory .  If - is specified, reads 
		     stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses this as input.
		-i   Ignores returned error codes.
		-k   Stops processing current entry on nonzero return, but 
		     continues with other branches that do not depend on that
		     entry.
		-m   Displays memory map: text, data, and stack.
		-n   Displays but does not execute commands needed to 
		     update target programs.
		-p   Displays macro definitions and target descriptions.
		-q   Returns zero exit status if file is updated or nonzero
		     exit status if file is not updated.
		-r   Does not use built-in rules.
		-s   Does not display commands before execution (silent mode).
		-t   Touches (updates) modification date only of each target 
		     program.

DOCUMENTATION	make(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Make--A Program for Maintaining Computer Programs" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual, Vol. 2A
-man
	
DESCRIPTION	The man command displays manual pages at your terminal.

SYNTAX		man [ options ] [ section ] title...

		  section   Section of the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual. 
			    If not specified, searches all sections.

		  title     Name of user command, system call, subroutine,
			    special file, file format, game, or maintenance 
			    command to be displayed.

OPTIONS		-    Squeezes multiple blank lines from output.
		-f   Displays one-line summary of each manual page that
		     contains one of the specified file names (next arguments).
		-k   Displays one-line summary of each manual page that 
		     contains one of the specified keywords (next arguments).
		-t   Phototypesets output (uses troff).

EXAMPLES	man 1 sync
		man 2 sync

DOCUMENTATION	man(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mdtar

DESCRIPTION	The mdtar command archives files to and from multiple
		RX50 diskettes.

SYNTAX	  	mdtar [ -C ] [ keys ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be archived.

OPTIONS		-C  Changes directories to that in the specified path
		    (next argument) before processing. This option
		    can be used multiple times on the same command line.

KEYS		A   Uses the specified number (next argument) as 
		    archive with which to begin the output.
		B   Forces input and output blocking to 20 blocks 
		    per record. 
		D   Specifies all directory output to be in v7tar
		    format. 
		F   Skips all SCCS directories, core files, and err 
		    files.  If additional F key (FF) is specified,
		    also skips all a.out and .o files.
		H   Displays help summary of all keys.
		M   Specifies the maximum archive number (1-99) to be 
		    written (next argument).
		N   Suppresses multivolume, file-splitting, and new 
		    header format from output.
		O   Additionally displays file owner and group names
		    for t and x keys.  For c, r, and u keys, displays
		    warning message if user and group IDs cannot be 
		    found in /etc/passwd or /etc/group, respectively.
		S   Creates output with /USER/GROUP standard archive 
		    headers.
		V   Displays expanded verbose information about all 
		    directories as well as files on the volume.
	       0-9  Uses specified drive number as alternate on which
		    archive is mounted.  If not specified, uses 
		    /dev/rht0.
		b   Uses specified number (next argument) as the 
		    blocking factor.  If not specified, uses 20 blocks.
		c   Creates a new archive library.
		d   Specifies RX50 as the device: uses /dev/rrx1.
		f   Uses specified file (next argument) as the name
		    of the archive. If not specified, uses /dev/rht0.
		g   Specifies 6250 bpi tape: uses /dev/rgt0.
		h   Saves a copy of the file (excludes symbolic links).
		i   Ignores checksum errors.
		k   Specifies TK50 as the device: uses /dev/rtk0.
		l   Displays error message if links cannot be resolved.
		m   Does not restore file modification time.
		n   Specifies 800 bp1 tape: uses /dev/rmt0.
		o   Suppresses all directory information.
		p   Restores each specified file to its original mode.
		r   Writes each specified file to the end of archive.
		s   Uses specified number (next argument) as size of 
		    media in 512-byte blocks.
		t   Generates archive table of contents.
		u   Updates the archive library: adds each if only if
		    it either is not already in archive or has been
		    modified since originally archived.
		v   Displays detailed (verbose) information as it 
		    archives files.
		w   Displays action to be taken for each file and 
		    prompts for confirmation.
		x   Extracts each specified file from the archive.

EXAMPLES	mdtar c -C /usr/include -C /etc
		mdtar cvb 10 /
	
DOCUMENTATION   tar(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mesg
	
DESCRIPTION	The mesg command allows you to permit or deny messages.

SYNTAX		mesg [ n ] [ y ]

		  n   Disallows messages from other users. 

		  y   Allows messages from other users.

EXAMPLES	mesg n
		mesg y

DOCUMENTATION	mesg(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mkdir
	
DESCRIPTION	The mkdir command makes new directories.

SYNTAX		mkdir name...

		  name   Name of each new directory to be created.

EXAMPLES	mkdir newdir1 newdir2

DOCUMENTATION	mkdir(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mkstr
	
DESCRIPTION	The mkstr command creates a message file from C programs.

SYNTAX		mkstr [ - ] msgfile prefix file...

		  msgfile  Name of file into which error messages are written.

		  prefix   Prefix name to be used in creating copies of
			   processed C source.
			    
		  file     Name of each C program to be processed.  If 
			   pathnames are not specified, searches current 
			   directory for each specified file.

OPTIONS		-   Places error messages at end of specified message file.

DOCUMENTATION	mkstr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mm

DESCRIPTION	The mm command formats text using nroff and the mm
		macro package.

SYNTAX	  	mm [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each text file to be processed.
			 If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-E   Invokes nroff with the -e option specified.
		-T   Uses the specified string (-Tstring) as the output
		     terminal type.  If not specified, uses the type
		     defined by the TERM environment variable.
		-c   Invokes the col command to process the input.
		-e   Invokes the neqn command to process the input.
		-l2  Formats the document in 12 pitch.
		-t   Invokes the tbl command to process the input.
		-y   Uses the uncompacted versions of the mm macros.

DOCUMENTATION   mm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Memorandum Macros" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary 
		Documents, Volume 2
-mmt

DESCRIPTION	The mmt command formats text using troff and the mm
		macro package.

SYNTAX	  	mmt [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each text file to be processed.
			 If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-T4014  Invokes the tc command to process the output
			for the Tektronix 4014 terminal.  
		-Ttek   Same as -T4014 option.
		-Tst    Writes output to the MH STARE facility.
		-Tvp    Writes output to the Versatec printer.
		-a      Invokes troff with the -a option specified.
		-e      Invokes the eqn command to process the input.
		-t      Invokes the tbl command to process the input.
		-y      Uses the uncompacted mm macros.

DOCUMENTATION   mmt(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Memorandum Macros" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 2
-more
	
DESCRIPTION	The more command displays file data at your terminal.

SYNTAX		more [ options ] [ +number ] [ +/string ] file... 

		  +number    Use specified line number as place to start
			     display.

		  +/string   Pattern to be searched for.  If found, 
			     display starts with two lines immediately 
			     preceding the line containing the pattern.
			     
		  file       Name of each file to be displayed.   

OPTIONS		-#   Uses specified number (#) as screen window size.
		-c   Clears screen (starting from the top) as it displays
		     next screen of data.  
		-d   Displays extended continuation prompt at end of each 
		     display.
		-f   Counts logical text lines (does not fold long lines). 
		     Normally, counts literal lines (including folded 
		     lines containing escape sequences).
		-l   Ignores line feeds (^Ls).  Normally, pauses at line feeds.
		-s   Squeezes multiple blank lines from output.
		-u   Ignores all underlining in the data.


EXAMPLES	more program1
		more program1 program2

DOCUMENTATION	more(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mt

DESCRIPTION	The mt command allows you to send commands directly to 
		the specified tape drive.

SYNTAX	  	mt [ -f ] cmd

		  cmd   Command to be performed.

OPTIONS		-f   Uses the specified file (next argument) as the tape
		     device.  If not specified, uses /dev/nrht0.

COMMANDS	bsf  Moves back the specified number of files (next 
	 	     argument). 
		bsr  Moves back the specified number of records (next
		     argument).
	      cache  Enables caching (TK50/TU81 only).
		cls  Clears the subsystem.
		clx  Reinitializes the tape unit.
		cse  Clears EOT (software clear).
	     diseot  Disables EOT driver code.
	     enaeot  Enables default EOT driver code.
		eof  Write the specified number of EOF marks (next 
		     argument) at the current tape position.
		fsf  Moves forward the specified number of files (next
		     argument).
		fsr  Moves forward the specified number of records (next
		     argument).
	    nocache  Disables caching (TK50/TU81 only).
	    offline  Rewinds the tape and places the unit off line.
	     rewind  Rewinds the tape.
	    rewoffl  Rewinds the tape and places the unit off line.
	     status  Displays status information. 
	       weof  Write the specified number of EOF marks (next 
		     argument) at the current tape position.
		
DOCUMENTATION   mt(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mv
	
DESCRIPTION	The mv command renames or moves files and directories.

SYNTAX		mv file1 file2
		mv file... directory

		  file1      Name of existing file or directory and new
		  file2      file name.

		  file       Name of each file to be moved to specified 
			     directory.

		  directory  Name of directory to which each named file 
			     is to be moved.

EXAMPLES	mv program1 old.program
		mv directory1 groupdir
		mv program1 program2 program3 /usr/staff/projectdir

DOCUMENTATION	mv(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-mvt

DESCRIPTION	The mvt command formats text using troff and the 
		mv macro package.

SYNTAX	  	mvt [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each text file to be processed.
			 If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-T4014  Invokes the tc command to process the output
			for the Tektronix 4014 terminal.  
		-Ttek   Same as -T4014 option.
		-Tst    Writes output to the MH STARE facility.
		-Tvp    Writes output to the Versatec printer.
		-a      Invokes troff with the -a option specified.
		-e      Invokes the eqn command to process the input.
		-t      Invokes the tbl command to process the input.
		-y      Uses the uncompacted mm macros.

DOCUMENTATION   mmt(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Viewgraphs and Slides Macros" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-neqn
	
DESCRIPTION	The neqn command formats mathematic equations to be
		displayed at your terminal.

SYNTAX		neqn [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-d   Sets text delimiters to specified characters (-dxy).
		     Both delimiters can be set to same character. 
		-f   Sets font to specified font number (-f#).
		-p   Reduces point size by specified points (-p#).
		-s   Sets equation size to specified number (-s#). 

DOCUMENTATION	eqn(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Typesetting Mathematics--User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-netstat

DESCRIPTION	The netstat command displays the status information for
		your local area network.

SYNTAX	  	netstat [ options ] [ interval ] [ system ] [ core ]

		  interval  Displays status information every interval
			    seconds.

		  system    Name of the system file to be used in place 
			    of /unix.

		  core      Name of the core file to be used in place of
			    /dev/kmem.

OPTIONS		-A   Displays the addresses of any associated protocol
		     control blocks.
		-a   Displays information for all sockets.  If not 
		     specified, does not display information for sockets
		     used by server processes.
		-i   Displays status information for autoconfigured
		     interfaces.
		-m   Displays information for the memory management 
		     routines.
		-n   Displays network addresses as numbers.
		-r   Displays network routing tables.
		-s   Displays protocol statistics.
		-t   Displays time since interface routine startups.

DOCUMENTATION   netstat(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-newgrp
	
DESCRIPTION	The newgrp command changes your current group ID to that of 
		the specified group.

SYNTAX		newgrp group

		  group  Group name to be changed to.

EXAMPLES	newgrp staff2

DOCUMENTATION	newgrp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-nice
	
DESCRIPTION	The nice command executes the specified command at a lower 
		scheduling priority.

SYNTAX		nice [ -n ] cmd [ arg... ]

		  cmd   Command to be executed.

		  arg   Each argument for specified command. 

OPTIONS		-#   Uses specified number (#) as increment for priority.
		     If number is not specified, increments priority by 10.
		   
EXAMPLES	nice -20 nroff -ms report1 report2 | lpr

DOCUMENTATION	nice(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-nl

DESCRIPTION	The nl command displays the text from each specified
		file with line numbers.

SYNTAX	  	nl [ options ] [ file... ]

OPTIONS		-b  Displays line numbers for text lines which match
		    the specified type (-btype).  The type can be: 
		    a (all lines), t (lines with printable text only),
		    n (no line numbering), pstring (lines that match
		    the specified string).  The default is a.
		-d  Uses the specified characters as delimiters
		    (-dxx).
		-f  Displays line numbers for footer lines that match 
		    the specified type (-ftype).  See type above.
		-h  Displays line numbers for header lines that match
		    the specified type (-htype).  See type above.
		-i  Uses the specified number (-i#) as the increment
		    value for numbering lines.
		-l  Uses the specified number (-l#) as the number of 
		    blank lines to fold together while numbering.
		-n  Formats line numbers according to the specified
		    key (-nkey).  The key can be: ln (left justified),
		    rn (right justified), and ra (right justified with
		    leading zeroes).
		-p  Does not restart numbering at logical page breaks.
		-s  Uses the specified character (-sx) to mark the
		    separation of line numbers and text.
		-v  Starts line numbers with the specified number (-v#).
		-w  Uses the specified number (-w#) as the number of 
		    characters for the line number display.  If not
		    specified, uses 6.

DOCUMENTATION   nl(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-nm

DESCRIPTION	The nm command displays the name list (symbolic table) for each
		specified object file.

SYNTAX		nm [ options ] [ file... ]  

		  file   Name of each object file to be processed.  If not 
			 specified, displays name list for a.out.  If archive
			 file is specified, displays name list for each object 
			 file in archive.

OPTIONS		-g   Displays global (external) symbols only.
		-n   Sorts display numerically, not alphabetically (default).
		-o   Prepends file name to each output line, not once for each 
		     group (default).
		-p   Displays in symbol table order (no sorts performed).
		-r   Sorts display in reverse order.
		-u   Displays undefined symbols only.

DOCUMENTATION	nm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-nohup
	
DESCRIPTION	The nohup command executes the specified command with hangups
		and termination signals from the controlling terminal disabled.

SYNTAX		nohup cmd [ arg... ]

		  cmd   Command to be executed.

		  arg   Each argument for specified command.

EXAMPLES	nohup nroff -ms report1 report2 | lpr

DOCUMENTATION	nice(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-nroff
	
DESCRIPTION	The nroff command provides a formatter with a full subset 
		of formatting macros.

SYNTAX		nroff [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be formatted.  If not specified,
			 or if - is specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 formats this input.

OPTIONS		-T   Uses specified name (-Tname) as terminal for which output
		     is prepared.
		-e   Formats text with equally spaced words, justified lines,
		     and full terminal resolution.
		-h   Uses tabs in horizontal spacing to speed up output and 
		     reduce output character count.
		-i   Reads stdin after input files are processed.
		-m   Uses specified macro package (-mxx) in formatting text.
		-n   Uses specified number (-n#) as first page to be printed.
		-o   Uses specified list (-olist) as only pages to be printed.
		-q   Invokes simultaneous input/output mode.
		-r   Sets named register to specified value (-rxvalue).
		-s   Stops after specified number of pages (-s#).

DOCUMENTATION	troff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"NROFF/TROFF User's Manual" and "A TROFF Tutorial" in the 
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1 
-od
	
DESCRIPTION	The od command creates a dump of the specified file.

SYNTAX		od [ options ] [ file ] [ [ + ]offset[ . ][ b ] ] 

		  file     Name of file to be dumped.  If not specified,
			   reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and dumps this input.

		  offset   Position in the file where the dump is to begin.  
			   If file is not specified, offset must be preceded
			   by plus (+).  If . suffix is specified, offset is
			   interpreted in decimal.  If b suffix is specified,
			   offset is interpreted in 512-byte blocks.

OPTIONS		-b   Displays bytes in octal.
		-c   Displays bytes in ASCII (nonprintable characters in C 
		     escapes equivalences or octal numbers).
		-d   Displays words in decimal. 
		-o   Displays words in octal (default).
		-x   Displays words in hexadecimal.

DOCUMENTATION	od(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-osdd

DESCRIPTION	The osdd command formats text using nroff and the 
		mosd macro package.

SYNTAX	  	osdd [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each text file to be processed.
			 If not specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-E   Invokes nroff with the -a option specified.
		-T   Uses the specified string (-Tstring) as the output
		     terminal type.  If not specified, uses the type
		     defined by the TERM environment variable.
		-c   Invokes the col command to process the input.
		-e   Invokes the neqn command to process the input.
		-l2  Formats the document in 12 pitch.
		-t   Invokes the tbl command to process the input.
		-y   Uses the uncompacted versions of the mm macros.

DOCUMENTATION   mm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Memorandum Macros" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary
		Documents, Volume 2
-pack

DESCRIPTION	The pack command compresses the data in each specified 
		file.

SYNTAX	  	pack [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-   Displays the number of times each byte is used,
		    its relative frequency, and its code.
		-f  Forces compression of the specified file.  This
		    option is useful for compressing an entire 
		    directory.
		
DOCUMENTATION   pack(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-page

DESCRIPTION	The page command displays file data at your terminal.

SYNTAX		page [ options ] [ +number ] [ +/string ] file... 

		  +number    Use specified line number as place to start
			     the display.

		  +/string   Pattern to be searched for.  If found, 
			     display starts with two lines immediately 
			     preceding the line containing the pattern.
			     
		  file       Name of each file to be displayed.   

OPTIONS		-#   Uses specified number (#) as screen window size.
		-d   Displays extended continuation prompt at end of each 
		     display.
		-f   Counts logical text lines (does not fold long lines). 
		     Normally, counts literal lines (including folded 
		     lines containing escape sequences).
		-l   Ignores line feeds (^Ls).  Normally, pauses at line feeds.
		-s   Squeezes multiple blank lines from output.
		-u   Ignores all underlining in the data.

DOCUMENTATION	more(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-passwd
	
DESCRIPTION 	The passwd command changes your login password.

SYNTAX		passwd [ -g ]

OPTIONS		-g  Changes the password entry in the /etc/group file 
		    for the specified group (next argument).  This option 
		    is restricted to use by the superuser only.

DOCUMENTATION	passwd(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-paste
	
DESCRIPTION	The paste command merges file data.

SYNTAX		paste [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file whose data is to be merged.  If
			 - is specified for any file, reads stdin until
			 <CTRL/D> and merges this input with named files.

OPTIONS		-d   Replaces the newline characters of all but last file with 
		     tabs (column separators).  If list of characters is added
		     (-dlist), uses these characters circularly in place of 
		     tabs.  The list may contain the following C escapes: 

			  \n (newline)
			  \t (tab)
			  \\ (backslash)
			  \0 (empty string).

		-s   Merges subsequent lines rather than one from each file.
		     Also uses tabs as column separators in all but last file,
		     except when used with -dlist option.

DOCUMENTATION	paste(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-pcat

DESCRIPTION	The pcat command concatenates the compressed data
		for each specified file into a continuous output
		stream.

SYNTAX	  	pcat file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.
		
DOCUMENTATION   pack(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-pcc

DESCRIPTION	The pcc command is the portable C compiler.

SYNTAX	  	pcc [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-D   Defines name to specified value (-Dname=value).  If value
		     not specified, defined to 1.
		-I   Searches named directory (-Idirectory) for include files. 
		-N   Places switch tables into text space.
		-O   Uses the object code optimizer (c2).
		-P   Runs preprocessor (cpp) and writes output to .i files.
		-S   Compiles programs and writes output to .s files.
		-U   Removes initial definition of name (-Uname).
		-V   Generates code suitable for overlaid programs.
		-c   Suppresses loading and produces an object (.o) file even 
		     if only one program is being complied.
		-o   Writes output to specified file (next argument).
		-p   Produces count of times each routine is called.

DOCUMENTATION	cc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Tour through the UNIX C Compiler" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
		"The C Programming Language--Reference Manual" and "UNIX 
		Programming--Second Edition" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary 
		Documents, Volume 1
-pi

DESCRIPTION	The pi command translates the specified Pascal program 
		into object code.

SYNTAX	  	pi [ options ] file...

		  file  Name of the Pascal source file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-b  Block buffers the output.
		-i  Enables the listing for any specified procedures
		    and functions, and while processing	any specified
		    include files.
		-l  Creates a program listing while translating source.
		-n  Begins each listed include file on a new page and
		    with a banner line.
		-p  Suppresses control flow backtraces on error.
		-s  Accepts standard Pascal only.
		-t  Suppresses runtime test of subrange variables.
		-u  Runs in card image mode.
		-w  Suppresses all warning diagnostics.
		-z  Enables execution profiling.

DOCUMENTATION   pi(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Berkeley Pascal User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-pix

DESCRIPTION	The pix command translates the specified Pascal source
		file and then executes the resulting object code.

SYNTAX	  	pix [ options ] file [ arg... ]

		  file   Name of the Pascal source file to be processed.

		  arg    Each argument that is to be passed to the 
			 Pascal program during its execution.

OPTIONS		-b  Block buffers the output.
		-i  Enables the listing for any specified procedures
		    and functions, and while processing	any specified
		    include files.
		-l  Creates a program listing while translating source.
		-n  Begins each listed include file on a new page and
		    with a banner line.
		-p  Suppresses control flow backtraces on error.
		-s  Accepts standard Pascal only.
		-t  Suppresses runtime test of subrange variables.
		-u  Runs in card image mode.
		-w  Suppresses all warning diagnostics.
		-z  Enables execution profiling.

DOCUMENTATION   pix(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Berkeley Pascal User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-plot

DESCRIPTION	The plot command produces plotting instructions for the
		specified terminal.

SYNTAX	  	plot [ options ] 

OPTIONS		raster  Uses the scan-converted image from 
			/usr/tmp/raster and sends the output directly
			to the plotter.
		-T      Uses the specified name (-Tname) as the terminal
			type for which plotting instructions are to be
			generated.

DOCUMENTATION   plot(1g) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-pr
	
DESCRIPTION 	The pr command prints and paginates file data.

SYNTAX		pr [ options ] [ +num ] [ file... ] 

		  +num   Begins printing with specified page number.

		  file   Name of each file to be printed.

OPTIONS		-#   Prints output in specified number of columns (-#).
       		-h   Prints output with specified header (next argument).
		-l   Uses specified number (-l#) as lines per page. If not 
		     specified, uses 66 lines/page.
		-m   Prints all files simultaneously, in multicolumns.
		-s   Uses specified character (-sc) as column separator.
		     If character not specified, uses tab.
		-t   Prints data without 5-line header and trailer.
		-w   Uses specified number (-w#) as page width (in 
		     characters).  If not specified, uses 72 characters.

DOCUMENTATION	pr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-prep
	
DESCRIPTION	The prep command produces a word list from file data.

SYNTAX		prep [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-d   Lists word number with word.
		-i   Ignores specified file (next argument).  If -d is 
		     specified, counts words but does not include them in list.
		-o   Lists words only in specified file (next argument). 
		     If -d is specified, counts words from other files but does
		     not include them in list.
		-p   Lists all punctuation on separate output lines.  If -d
		     also is specified, does not count them as words.

DOCUMENTATION	prep(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-primes

DESCRIPTION	The primes command reads stdin until <RETURN> and
		displays all primes that are greater than or equal to
		the specified number.

SYNTAX	  	primes

DOCUMENTATION   factor(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-print

DESCRIPTION	The print command paginates and submits files for
		printing at the line printer.

SYNTAX		print file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	lpr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-printenv
	
DESCRIPTION 	The printenv command displays the current values of your
		environment variables.

SYNTAX		printenv [ name ]

		  name   Variable to be displayed.  If name is not specified,
			 displays all currently set variables.

EXAMPLES	printenv 
		printenv MAIL

DOCUMENTATION	printenv(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-prof
	
DESCRIPTION	The prof command displays program profile data.

SYNTAX		prof [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of object file to be profiled.

OPTIONS		-a   Displays all symbols. If not specified, displays external 
		     symbols only.
		-l   Displays output by symbol value. If not specified, 
		     displays output by decreasing percentages.   
		-v   Produces graphic output to be used with plot(1g) command.
		     Additional -low and -high numbers select the profile 
		     percentage to be plotted with higher resolution (defaults
		     are 0 and 100, respectively).

DOCUMENTATION	prof(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-prs

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS prs command displays information from an SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs prs [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-a  Displays information for both existing and removed deltas.
		-d  Displays information specified by dataspec (-dstring).
		-e  Displays information for all deltas created earlier than
		    and including specified delta (-e#).
		-l  Displays information for all deltas created including
		    and later than specified delta (-l#).
		-r  Indicates specified delta version number (-r#).

DOCUMENTATION	prs(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-prt

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS prt command displays a list of all changes made to a
		SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs prt file...

		  file  Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-ps
	
DESCRIPTION	The ps command displays current process status information.

SYNTAX		ps [ option ] [ list ] [ core ]

		  list   Name list that is to be used.  If not specified, 
			 uses /unix.

		  core   Name of core file from which the information is 
			 to be gathered.  If not specified, uses /dev/mem and
			 gathers current system information.

OPTIONS		-a   Displays information for processes executed from all user
		     terminals.  If not specified, displays information only 
		     for processes executed from your terminal.
		-l   Displays information in long format: F (flags), S (state),
		     UID (userID), PID (process ID), PPID (parent process ID),
		     CPU (processor utilization), PRI (priority), NICE 
		     (priority computation), ADDR (memory address), SZ
		     (size in 512-byte blocks), WCHAN (waiting/sleeping),
		     TTY (terminal), TIME (execution time), and CMD (command 
		     currently being executed).		      
		-t   Uses specified number (-t#) and displays information 
		     for that terminal only.
		-v   Displays process's system time and user time in 
		     addition to cumulative time.
		-x   Displays information for all processes, including those
		     not executed from terminals.

DOCUMENTATION	ps(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ptx
	
DESCRIPTION	The ptx command generates a permuted index.

SYNTAX		ptx [ options ] [ file1 [ file2 ] ]

		  file1   Name of input file from which index is to be
			  generated.  If not specified, reads stdin until 
			  <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

		  file2   Name of output file to which index is to be 
			  written.  If not specified, writes output to stdout.

OPTIONS		-b   Uses characters in specified file (next argument) as 
		     separators.
		-f   Folds upper and lower case when sorting.
		-g   Uses specified number (next argument) as interfield gap.
		     If not specified, uses three characters.
		-i   Ignores words listed in specified file (next argument).
		     If -i and -o are not specified, ignores words listed 
		     in /usr/lib/eign.
		-o   Uses words listed only in specified file (next argument).
		-r   Uses leading nonblanks as reference identifiers.
		-t   Produces output ready for phototypesetter.
		-w   Uses specified number (next argument) as width of output
		     line.  If not specified, uses 72 characters.

DOCUMENTATION	ptx(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-pwd
	
DESCRIPTION	The pwd command displays the name (absolute path) of your
		current working directory.

SYNTAX		pwd

DOCUMENTATION	pwd(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-px

DESCRIPTION	The px command executes the specified Pascal object file

SYNTAX	  	px [ file ] [ arg... ]

		  file   Name of the Pascal object file to be processed.

		  arg    Each argument that is to be passed to the 
			 Pascal program during its execution.

DOCUMENTATION   px(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Berkeley Pascal User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Document, Volume 2
-pxp

DESCRIPTION	The pxp command generates an execution profile for
		the specified Pascal object file.

SYNTAX	  	pxp [ options ] file

		  file   Name of the Pascal object file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-#  Uses the specified number (#) as the indentation 
		    unit.  If not specified, uses 4.
		-_  Underscores all keywords.
		-a  Displays all procedures (even those not executed).
		-c  Uses the core file in generating the profiling data.
		-d  Displays all declaration parts.
		-e  Eliminates include directives when reformatting the
		    file.
		-f  Displays all parenthesized expressions.
		-j  Left justifies all procedures and functions.
		-n  Begins a new page for each included file.
		-s  Strips comments from the input text.
		-t  Displays a table that summarizes procedure and
		    function call counts.
		-u  Generates the output in card image format.
		-w  Suppresses all warning diagnostics.
		-z  Generates an execution profile for the specified
		    modules (next arguments).  If none are specified,
		    generates execution profile for the entire program.	

DOCUMENTATION   pxp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Berkeley Pascal User's Guide" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-ranlib
	
DESCRIPTION	The ranlib command converts archives to random libraries.

SYNTAX		ranlib archive...

		  archive   Name of each archive library to be converted.

DOCUMENTATION   ranlib(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ratfor
	
DESCRIPTION	The ratfor command converts a dialect of FORTRAN into ordinary
		FORTRAN code.

SYNTAX		ratfor [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be converted. 

OPTIONS		-C   Copies all comments to output and attempts to format them
		     neatly.
		-6x  Places continuation character (x) in column 6.
		-h   Converts quoted strings to 27H constructs.

DOCUMENTATION	ratfor(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"RATFOR--A Preprocessor for a Rational Fortran" in the 
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-rcp

DESCRIPTION	The rcp command copies data from files on your host 
		machine to files on a remote machine.

SYNTAX	  	rcp [ options ] file... string

		  file     Name of each file to be copied.

		  string   Character string that either identifies
			   the local file to be copied to or a remote
			   host name and, if required, a path name
			   (rhost:[path]).  If path is not specified,
			   copies data to file of the same name in your
			   home directory on the remote machine.

OPTIONS		-p  Attempts to preserve the mode and modification times
		    (ignores umask) as it copies each file.
		-r  Recursively copies files in all subdirectories,
		    if the specified file to be copied is a directory.
		
DOCUMENTATION   rcp(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-red

DESCRIPTION	The red command is a restricted version of the ed text
		editor.

SYNTAX	  	red [ - ] file

		  file   Name of file to be edited.  The red command edits 
			 a copy of the named file and updates source file only
			 when the write command (w) is invoked.  If not 
			 specified, edits unnamed temporary file.

OPTIONS		-   Suppresses all character count displays.  Normally, ed
		    displays a character count when invoked, whenever
		    you edit another file (e), read in data from another
		    file (r), or write out to file (w).

DOCUMENTATION	ed(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"A Tutorial Introduction to the UNIX Text Editor" and "Advanced
		Editing on UNIX" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, 
		Volume 1
-refer
	
DESCRIPTION	The refer command finds and formats bibliographic references
		for nroff and troff files.

SYNTAX		refer [ options ]

OPTIONS		-a   Uses specified name (-aname) and reverses order of first
		     entry for that name only.  If name not specified, reverses
		     order of names for all entries.
		-b   Creates bare entries: no flags, numbers, or labels.
		-c   Uses specified string (-cstring) and capitalizes fields
		     whose key letters are in string.
		-e   Accumulates all references in one list.  If not specified,
		     creates references where encountered in text.
		-k   Uses specified label (-klabel) in place of numbering for
		     each reference.
		-l   Uses specified characters and digits (-lc,#) and creates
		     labels for all references using senior author's list and 
		     only specified characters of each last name and specified 
		     digits of the date.
		-n   Does not search /usr/dict/papers.
		-p   Uses specified file (next argument) as file to be 
		     searched before /usr/dict/papers.  If not specified,
		     searches /usr/dict/papers only.
		-s   Uses specified key (-sstring) in sorting references. 

DOCUMENTATION	refer(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Some Applications of Inverted Indexes on the UNIX System" in 
		the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-regcmp

DESCRIPTION	The regcmp command complies the regular expressions in
		each specified file and writes all output to a .i file.

SYNTAX	  	regcmp [ - ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-   Writes output to a .c file in place of the .i file.
		
DOCUMENTATION   regcmp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-renice
	
DESCRIPTION	The renice command reschedules the priority of your processes.

SYNTAX		renice num pid...

		  num   Number to be used in rescheduling. A positive number
			reschedules a lower priority.  A negative number
			reschedules a higher priority.
 
		  pid   Process ID number of each process to be rescheduled.    
 
EXAMPLES	renice 30 12877 12898
		renice -5 3450 

DOCUMENTATION	renice(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-reset

DESCRIPTION	The reset command resets your terminal mode.

SYNTAX	  	reset

DOCUMENTATION   tset(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rev
	
DESCRIPTION 	The rev command reverses the order of characters in each line
		of a file.

SYNTAX		rev [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

DOCUMENTATION 	rev(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rlogin

DESCRIPTION	The rlogin command logs you into the specified remote
		system.

SYNTAX	  	rlogin system [ options ]

		  system   Name of the remote system to be logged into.

OPTIONS		-e   Uses the specified character (next argument) as the
		     rlogin escape character.  If not specified, uses a
		     tilde (~).
		
		-l   Logs you in as the specified user (next argument),
		     not as your user login name.

DOCUMENTATION   rlogin(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rm
	
DESCRIPTION	The rm command removes a directory entry for a file.

SYNTAX		rm [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each file whose directory entry is to be 
			 removed (unlinked).  When the last entry (link) 
			 to a file is removed, only then is its data removed O
			 from the file system.

OPTIONS		-    Specifies that the file names begin with a minus (-name).
		-f   Suppresses normal diagnostics/prompts and attempts to 
		     force the removal.
		-i   Prompts for yes or no response before removing each entry.
		-r   Recursively removes all entries from the specified 
	 	     directory and, then, removes the entry for that directory
		     from its parent directory.

DOCUMENTATION	rm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rmail

DESCRIPTION	The rmail command routes the remote mail received from
		the uucp command.

SYNTAX	  	rmail user...

		  user   Name of each user for which mail is to be sent.

DOCUMENTATION   rmail(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rmdel

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS rmdel command removes the specified delta version
		from an SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs rmdel -r file...

		  file  Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-r  Indicates specified delta version number (-r#).

DOCUMENTATION	rmdel(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-rmdir
	
DESCRIPTION	The rmdir command removes the entry for each empty directory
		from its parent directory.

SYNTAX		rmdir directory

		  directory  Name of each empty directory whose entry is to be
			     removed.

EXAMPLES	rmdir project.dir

DOCUMENTATION	rm(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-roff
	
DESCRIPTION	The roff command provides a simple text formatter.

SYNTAX		roff [ options ] [ +num ] file...

		  +num  Starts printing with specified page.

		  file     Name of each file to be formatted.

OPTIONS		-#   Stops printing after specified page (-#).
       		-h   Inserts tabs (when appropriate) in place of spaces.
		-s   Stops printing before each page (including first)
		     to allow for paper manipulation.  Resumes printing
		     on receipt of interrupt signal.

DOCUMENTATION	roff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rsh

DESCRIPTION	The rsh command logs you in to the named remote system
		and executes the specified command sequence.

SYNTAX	  	rsh system [ options ] cmd

		  system   Name of the remote system.

		  cmd      Complete command sequence that is to be 
			   executed.

OPTIONS		-l   Logs you in as the specified user (next argument),
		     not as your user login name.

		-n   Redirects all command input from /dev/null.
		
DOCUMENTATION   rsh(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rsh5

DESCRIPTION	The rsh5 command is the restricted SYSTEM V version of 
		the Bourne shell that provides an interactive command 
		line interpreter and has a full subset of options,
		special characters, and control flow constructs.

SYNTAX	  	rsh5 [ options ] [ arg... ]

		  arg   Name of each command sequence to be executed.
			If not specified, invokes rsh5 command for 
			interactive execution.

OPTIONS		-a  Marks those variables which are modified or created
		    for export.
		-c  Executes the specified commands (next arguments).
		-e  Exits immediately on unsuccessful execution of
		    a command.
		-f  Disable file name expansion.
		-h  Locates and remembers all function commands.
		-i  Invokes rsh5 for interactive session.
		-k  Places all specified keywords (next arguments)
		    into current execution environment.
		-n  Reads all commands but does not execute them.
		-s  Reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses this input
		    as the command sequences to be executed.
		-t  Exit after executing one command only.
		-u  Treats all undefined variables as an error.
		-v  Displays each input line upon execution.
		-x  Displays all command sequences before execution.

DOCUMENTATION   sh5(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-ruptime

DESCRIPTION	The ruptime command displays the current status of each
		network machine.

SYNTAX	  	ruptime [ options ]

OPTIONS		-a  Displays a count of all users who have been idle
		    for an hour or more.  If not specified, omits this
		    information. 

		-l  Sorts information by load average, not by host name.

		-t  Sorts information by host uptime, not by host name.
		
		-u  Sorts information by number of user, not by host 
		    name.

DOCUMENTATION   ruptime(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-rwho

DESCRIPTION	The rwho command displays who is logged in to all 
		machines on your network.

SYNTAX	  	rwho [ -a ]

OPTIONS		-a  Displays the names of all users who have been idle
		    for an hour or more.  If not specified, omits this
		    information. 
		
DOCUMENTATION   rwho(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-s5make

DESCRIPTION	s5make, if installed, is the SYSTEM V replacement for
		the make command.

DOCUMENTATION	s5make(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Augmented Version of Make" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Programmer's Manual, Vol. 2B
-sact

DESCRIPTION	The sact command displays the delta and edit status
		of each specified SCCS file.

SYNTAX	  	sact file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.
			 If - is specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D>
			 and uses this input as the file name.

DOCUMENTATION   sact(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sccs

DESCRIPTION	The sccs command provides a Source Code Control System that
		has a full subset of commands.

SYNTAX		sccs [ options ] arg...

		  arg  Each SCCS command sequence (command options arguments)
		       to be executed under control of sccs.

OPTIONS		-d  Prepends named directory path (-dpath) to specified file
		    name.
		-p  Additionally prepends named path (-ppath) between directory
		    and specified file name.
		-r  Preserves your user ID during execution.

COMMANDS	admin      Administers SCCS files.
		cdc	   Changes delta commentary.
		check	   Checks if SCCS files are currently being edited.
		clean      Removes all recreatable SCCS files.
		comb       Combines deltas.
		create     Creates SCCS files.
		deledit    Creates new delta and edits file.
		delget     Creates delta and gets a copy of file.
		delta      Creates delta, saving changes.
		edit       Edits SCCS file.
		fix	   Removes current delta.
		get	   Gets copy of an SCCS file.
		info       Displays information about SCCS files being edited.
		prs	   Displays information from SCCS files.
		prt	   Displays list of delta changes.
		rmdel      Removes delta.
		sccsdiff   Compares two deltas.
		sccshelp   Displays explanations of error messages.
		tell       Displays names of SCCS file being edited.
		unedit     Undoes SCCS edit command.
		unget	   Undoes SCCS get and edit commands.
		val	   Validates SCCS files.
		what       Finds and displays ID keywords.

		For further information about an sccs command, type:

		  help COMMAND

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-sccsdiff

DESCRIPTION	The sccsdiff command compare two deltas and displays their 
		differences.

SYNTAX		sccs sccsdiff [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be compared.

OPTIONS		-p  Displays output using pr command.
		-r  Indicates deltas to be compared (-r#1 and -r#2).
		-s  Sets number of lines each segment is to contain (-s#).

DOCUMENTATION	sccsdiff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-sccshelp

DESCRIPTION	The sccshelp command displays short explanations of SCCS 
		error messages and command syntax lines.

SYNTAX		sccshelp [ arg... ]

		  arg  Each error message or command name for which you 
		       want an explanation displayed.

DOCUMENTATION	sccshelp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-script
	
DESCRIPTION	The script command generates a typescript of your terminal 
		session until <CTRL/D>.

SYNTAX		script [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of file into which typescript is written.
			 If file is not specified, uses file "typescript".

OPTIONS		-S   Uses specified shell (next argument).  If this shell is
		     not available, uses any shell that it can find.
		-a   Appends output to typescript file.
		-n   Uses new shell (site dependent).
		-q   Suppresses normal startup and done messages.
		-s   Uses standard shell (normally, sh).

DOCUMENTATION	script(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sdiff

DESCRIPTION	The sdiff command determines the differences between
		two files and displays the differences in a two column
		listing.

SYNTAX	  	sdiff [ options ] file1 file2

		  file1   Name of the two files to be processed.
		  file2

OPTIONS		-l  Displays the left side of all identical lines.
		
		-o  Uses the specified file (next argument) and 
		    creates a user-controlled merge file.

		-s  Suppresses all identical lines from the output.

		-w  Uses the specified number (next argument) as the
		    width of the output lines.

DOCUMENTATION   sdiff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sed
	
DESCRIPTION	The sed command provides a noninteractive, stream editor that 
		provides a full range of commands.

SYNTAX		sed [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be edited.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and edits this input.

OPTIONS		-e   Uses specified file (next argument) as input file of
		     commands to be executed.
		-f   Uses specified file (next argument) as input file of
		     commands to be executed.   May be used in conjunction with
		     -e option to indicate two script files.
		-n   Suppresses all normal output.

DOCUMENTATION	sed(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"SED--A Non-interactive Text Editor" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-sh

DESCRIPTION	The sh command provides an interactive command 
		interpreter that has a full subset of options,
		special characters, and control flow constructs.

SYNTAX	  	sh [ options ] [ arg... ]

		  arg   Name of each command sequence to be executed.
			If not specified, invokes sh command for 
			interactive execution.

OPTIONS		-c  Executes the specified commands (next arguments).
		-e  Exits immediately on unsuccessful execution of
		    a command.
		-i  Invokes sh for interactive session.
		-k  Places all specified keywords (next arguments)
		    into current execution environment.
		-n  Reads all commands but does not execute them.
		-s  Reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses this input
		    as the command sequences to be executed.
		-t  Exit after executing one command only.
		-u  Treats all undefined variables as an error.
		-v  Displays each input line upon execution.
		-x  Displays all commands sequences before execution.

DOCUMENTATION   sh(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sh5

DESCRIPTION	The sh5 command is the SYSTEM V version of the sh
		command that provides an interactive command line
		interpreter and has a full subset of options,
		special characters, and control flow constructs.

SYNTAX	  	sh5 [ options ] [ arg... ]

		  arg   Name of each command sequence to be executed.
			If not specified, invokes sh5 command for 
			interactive execution.

OPTIONS		-a  Marks those variables which are modified or created
		    for export.
		-c  Executes the specified commands (next arguments).
		-e  Exits immediately on unsuccessful execution of
		    a command.
		-f  Disable file name expansion.
		-h  Locates and remembers all function commands.
		-i  Invokes sh5 for interactive session.
		-k  Places all specified keywords (next arguments)
		    into current execution environment.
		-n  Reads all commands but does not execute them.
		-r  Invokes sh5 for restricted session.	
		-s  Reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses this input
		    as the command sequences to be executed.
		-t  Exit after executing one command only.
		-u  Treats all undefined variables as an error.
		-v  Displays each input line upon execution.
		-x  Displays all command sequences before execution.

DOCUMENTATION   sh5(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-size
	
DESCRIPTION	The size command displays the sizes of each segment for the
		specified object file. 

SYNTAX		size [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each object program to be sized.  If not
			 specified, displays the sizes of a.out in current
			 directory.

DOCUMENTATION	size(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sleep
	
DESCRIPTION	The sleep command suspends execution for the specified time.

SYNTAX		sleep time

		  time   Number of seconds that execution is suspended.

DOCUMENTATION 	sleep(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sort
	
DESCRIPTION	The sort command sorts and merges file data.

SYNTAX		sort [ options ] [ +pos [ -pos ] ] [ file... ]

		  +pos   Data field (inclusive) at which sorting is to begin.

		  -pos   Data file (exclusive) before which sorting is to end.

		  file   Name of each file to be sorted and merged.  If not 
			 specified, or if - is specified, reads stdin until 
			 <CTRL/D> and sorts this input.

OPTIONS		-T   Uses specified directory (next argument) to build 
		     temporary files.
		-b   Ignores all leading blanks (spaces and tabs).
		-c   Checks that input file was sorted according to ordering
		     rules and displays output only if out of order.
		-d   Sorts data according to dictionary ordering: letters,
		     digits, and blanks only.
		-f   Folds upper case to lower case while sorting.
		-i   Ignores character outside ASCII range 040-0176.
		-m   Merges previously sorted data.
		-n   Sorts fields containing numbers numerically, fields 
		     containing alphanumerics alphabetically.
		-o   Uses specified file (next argument) as output file.
		     If not specified, write output to stdout.
		-r   Reverses sorting order (descending).
		-t   Uses specified character (-tc) as field separator.
		-u   Suppresses all duplicate entries.

DOCUMENTATION	sort(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-spell
	
DESCRIPTION	The spell command checks data for spelling errors.

SYNTAX		spell [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be checked.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and checks this input.

OPTIONS		-b   Checks data according to British spellings.
		-v   Displays all words not found in the spelling list with
		     all plausible derivations.
		-x   Precedes each word with = and displays all plausible
		     derivations.

DOCUMENTATION	spell(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-spline

DESCRIPTION	The spline command draws a smooth curve from specified input.  

SYNTAX		spline [ options ]

OPTIONS		-?   Uses specified value (-?) for boundary value constant.
		-#   Uses specified number (-#) in calculating intervals
		     between lower and upper limits.  If not specified,
		     uses 100.
		-a   Supplies the abscissa automatically (not specified in 
		     input) and uses specified number (next argument) for 
		     spacing.  If not specified, uses 1 for spacing.
		-p   Periodically produces output (matches derivatives at 
		     ends).
		-x   Uses specified numbers (next arguments) as lower and upper
		     limits, respectively.  If first argument is not specified,
		     uses 0 as lower limit.  If neither argument is specified,
		     calculates values from data.

DOCUMENTATION	spline(1g) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-split
	
DESCRIPTION	The split command divides a file into smaller files.

SYNTAX		split [ -# ] [ file [ name ] ] 

		  file   Name of file to be split.  If not specified or
			 if - is specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 splits this input into smaller files.

		  name   Name with which each output file is to be created. 
			 Each file is created with this name and the suffix 
			 aa, ab, ac, and so on.  If not specified, creates
			 each output file with name x and suffixes aa, ab, ac,
			 and so on.
 
OPTIONS		-#   Uses specified number (#) as number of lines that are to 
		     be written to each output file.  If # is not specified, 
		     uses 1000.

DOCUMENTATION	split(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-strings
	
DESCRIPTION	The strings command displays all printable ASCII strings
		in each specified object file.

SYNTAX		strings [ options ] file...

		   file   Name of each object file to be processed.  

OPTIONS		-   Looks through the entire object file for ASCII strings.
		    If not specified, looks only in the initialized data space.
		-#  Uses specified number (#) as minimum string length.  If not
		    specified, uses four characters.
		-o  Precedes each string with its file offset (octal).

DOCUMENTATION	strings(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-strip
	
DESCRIPTION	The strip command removes all symbols and relocation bits from 
		each specified object file.

SYNTAX		strip file...

		  file   Name of each object file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	strip(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-struct

DESCRIPTION	The struct command converts ordinary FORTRAN code to rational 
		FORTRAN (ratfor) code.

SYNTAX		struct [ options ] file

		  file   Name of file to be converted.

OPTIONS		-a   Converts else-if sequences into non-Ratfor switch forms.
		-b   Generates goto statements in place of multilevel breaks.
		-e   Uses the specified number (-e#) to test loops. 
		-i   Does not convert goto statements into switches.
		-n   Generates goto statements in place of multilevel next 
		     statements.
		-s   Accepts input in standard format: comment character in
		     column one and continuation character in column six.

DOCUMENTATION	struct(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-stty
	
DESCRIPTION	The stty command normally is executed from your .login file to
		set up your terminal I/O characteristics.

SYNTAX		stty [ options ]

OPTIONS		brk       Sets brk character to specified character (next 
			  argument). 
		bs0 bs1   Selects backspace delay.
		cbreak    Makes characters available as received.
		cooked    Same as -raw.
		cr0 cr1 cr2 cr3
			  Selects carriage return delay.
		crt       Sets crt options.
		crtbs     Sets crt backspace.
		crtkill   Uses crterase to kill line.
		ctlecho   Echoes control characters as ^X
		crterase  Sets erase characters with "backspace space 
			  backspace".
		dec       Sets erase = DEL, kill = ^U, intr = ^C.
		echo      Echoes every character.
		ek 	  Resets erase and kill to # and @.
		eof       Sets eof character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		erase     Sets erase character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		even      Allows even parity.
		ff0 ff1   Selects form feed delay.
		hup       Hangs up dataphone on last close.
		intr      Sets interrupt character to specified character (next
			  argument).
		kill      Sets kill character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		lcase     Translates upper case to lower case.
		min	  Sets minimum number of characters (next argument) 
			  that should be received to satisfy read.
		nl	  Accepts only newline character to terminate lines.
		nl0 nl1 nl2 nl3
			  Selects linefeed delay.
		odd       Allows odd parity.
		prterase  Echoes erase between \ and /.
		quit      Sets quit character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		raw       Pass all characters (no character processing).
		start     Sets start character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		stop      Sets stop character to specified character (next 
			  argument).
		tabs      Preserves tabs.
		tab0 tab1 tab2 tab3
			  Select tab delay.
		time	  Sets timer (next argument) in 0.1 granularity for
			  timeout bursty and short term data transmissions.
		-option   Negates option.

DOCUMENTATION	stty(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-su
	
DESCRIPTION	The su command temporarily substitutes your user ID to that 
		of the specified user.

SYNTAX		su [ - ] [ user ]

		  user   Login name of user whose ID is to be substituted.
			 Where applicable, prompts for user's login password.
			 If correct password is given, invokes a new shell 
			 running under user's ID.  If not specified, assumes
			 root and prompts for the appropriate password.

OPTIONS		-   Establishes user's login environment: changes directory 
		    to user's home directory and invokes user's login shell.

DOCUMENTATION	su(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-sum
	
DESCRIPTION 	The sum command displays a 16-bit checksum and the size in
		blocks of the specified file.

SYNTAX		sum file

		  file   Name of file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION 	sum(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tabs
	
DESCRIPTION	The tabs command sets the tabs spacing for your terminal.

SYNTAX		tabs [ -n ] [ special ]

		  special   Special file of terminal to be affected.

OPTIONS		-n   Does not indent left margin. 

DOCUMENTATION	tabs(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tail

DESCRIPTION	The tail command displays file data.

SYNTAX		tail [ pos ] [ file ]

		  pos    Where display is to begin: +number (from beginning
			 of file) and -number (from end of file). You can add 
			 a units indicator to the position argument: b 
			 (blocks), c (characters), or l (lines).  If not 
			 specified, counts by units of lines.  You also 
			 can add these optional function keys: f (do not 
			 quit at end-of-file) and r (print lines from end 
			 in reverse order).

		  file   Name of file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and displays data from 
			 this input.

EXAMPLES	tail +150lr program1
		tail -10bf program1

DOCUMENTATION	tail(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-talk

DESCRIPTION	The talk command provides two-way communication
		between you and the specified user.

SYNTAX	  	talk user [ tty ]

		  user   Login name of the user with whom you wish
			 to communicate.

		  tty    Special file name of the terminal for which
			 the talk session is to apply.  This argument
			 is useful when the specified user is logged 
			 in more than once.

DOCUMENTATION   talk(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tar

DESCRIPTION	The tar command archives files to and from multiple
		tape volumes.

SYNTAX	  	tar [ -C ] [ keys ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be archived.

OPTIONS		-C  Changes directories to that in the specified path
		    (next argument) before processing. This option
		    can be used multiple times on the same command line.

KEYS		A   Uses the specified number (next argument) as 
		    archive with which to begin the output.
		B   Forces input and output blocking to 20 blocks 
		    per record. 
		D   Specifies all directory output to be in v7tar
		    format. 
		F   Skips all SCCS directories, core files, and err 
		    files.  If additional F key (FF) is specified,
		    also skips all a.out and .o files.
		H   Displays help summary of all keys.
		M   Specifies the maximum archive number (1-99) to be 
		    written (next argument).
		N   Suppresses multivolume, file-splitting, and new 
		    header format from output.
		O   Additionally displays file owner and group names
		    for t and x keys.  For c, r, and u keys, displays
		    warning message if user and group IDs cannot be 
		    found in /etc/passwd or /etc/group, respectively.
		S   Creates output with /USER/GROUP standard archive 
		    headers.
		V   Displays expanded verbose information about all 
		    directories as well as files on the volume.
	       0-9  Uses specified drive number as alternate on which
		    archive is mounted.  If not specified, uses 
		    /dev/rht0.
		b   Uses specified number (next argument) as the 
		    blocking factor.  If not specified, uses 20 blocks.
		c   Creates a new archive library.
		d   Specifies RX50 as the device: uses /dev/rrx1.
		f   Uses specified file (next argument) as the name
		    of the archive. If not specified, uses /dev/rht0.
		g   Specifies 6250 bpi tape: uses /dev/rgt0.
		h   Saves a copy of the file (excludes symbolic links).
		i   Ignores checksum errors.
		k   Specifies TK50 as the device: uses /dev/rtk0.
		l   Displays error message if links cannot be resolved.
		m   Does not restore file modification time.
		n   Specifies 800 bp1 tape: uses /dev/rmt0.
		o   Suppresses all directory information.
		p   Restores each specified file to its original mode.
		r   Writes each specified file to the end of archive.
		s   Uses specified number (next argument) as size of 
		    media in 512-byte blocks.
		t   Generates archive table of contents.
		u   Updates the archive library: adds each if only if
		    it either is not already in archive or has been
		    modified since originally archived.
		v   Displays detailed (verbose) information as it 
		    archives files.
		w   Displays action to be taken for each file and 
		    prompts for confirmation.
		x   Extracts each specified file from the archive.

EXAMPLES	tar c -C /usr/include -C /etc
		tar cvb 10 /
	
DOCUMENTATION   tar(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tbl
	
DESCRIPTION	The tbl command formats tables for nroff and troff processing.

SYNTAX		tbl [ file... ]

		  file  Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

DOCUMENTATION	tbl(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"TBL--A Program to Format Tables" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-tc
	
DESCRIPTION	The tc command simulates phototypesetter output.

SYNTAX		tc [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-l   Multiplies page aspect ratio (1.5) by l/w (must be 
		     quoted on command line). 
		-p   Uses specified page length (-pL). This length can include
		     scale factors: p (points), i (inches), c (centimeters), 
		     and P (picas). 
		-s   Skips specified number of pages (-s#).
		-t   Does not wait between pages.  

DOCUMENTATION	tc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tee
	
DESCRIPTION	The tee command pipes input to your terminal (stdout) and to
		each specified file.

SYNTAX		tee [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to which input is to be written.
			 If not specified, writes data to stdout only.

OPTIONS		-a   Appends input to existing files.
		-i   Ignores interrupts.

DOCUMENTATION	tee(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tell

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS tell command displays the names of those SCCS file 
		currently being edited.

SYNTAX		sccs tell

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-telnet

DESCRIPTION	The telnet command provides an interactive user
		interface to the TELNET protocol that has a full
		set of subcommands for communicating with another 
		host machine.

SYNTAX	  	telnet [ system ] [ port ]

		  system  Name of the remote system.  If not specified,
			  prompts for the remote system name. 

		  port    Number of the port to be connected to.  If not
			  specified, uses default port.
		
DOCUMENTATION   telnet(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-test
	
DESCRIPTION	The test command evaluates specified conditional expressions.

SYNTAX		test expr

		  expr   Expression to be evaluated.  Expressions
			 can test: file conditions, numerical comparisons,
			 or string comparisons (see below).  

EXPRESSIONS	-d   Tests if file (next argument) exists and is a directory.
		-f   Tests if file (next argument) exists and is not a 
		     directory.
		-n   Tests if length of string (next argument) is nonzero.
		-r   Tests if file (next argument) exists and is readable.
		-s   Tests if file (next argument) exists and size is greater
		     than 0.
		-t   Tests if file descriptor (next argument) is terminal.  
		     If fd not specified, tests descriptor 1.
		-w   Tests if file (next argument) exists and is writable.
		-z   Tests if length of string (next argument) is zero.
		n1 -eq n2      
		     Tests if number1 equals number2.
		n1 -ge n2      
		     Tests if number1 is greater than or equal to number2.
		n1 -gt n2      
		     Tests if number1 is greater than number2.
		n1 -le n2      
		     Tests if number1 is less than or equal to number2.
		n1 -lt n2      
		     Tests if number1 is less than number2.
		n1 -ne n2      
		     Tests if number1 does not equal number2.
		s1   Tests if string1 is not a null string.
		s1 = s2	
		     Tests if string1 and string2 are equal.
		s1 != s2       
		     Tests if string1 and string2 are not equal.
		! expr	 
		     Negates evaluation of expression.
		expr -a expr   
		     Tests logical and of two expressions.
		expr -o expr   
		     Tests logical or of two expressions.
		( expr... )    
		     Groups expressions.

DOCUMENTATION	test(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tftp

DESCRIPTION	The tftp command is an interactive user interface
		to the ARPANET standard Trivial File Transfer Protocol
		that has a full subset of commands for transferring
		files to and from remote systems.

SYNTAX	  	tftp [ system ] [ port ]

		  system  Name of the remote system.  If not specified,
			  prompts for the remote system name. 

		  port    Number of the port to be connected to.  If not
			  specified, uses default port.
		
DOCUMENTATION   tftp(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-time
	
DESCRIPTION	The time command displays execution times for the specified 
		command.

SYNTAX		time cmd

		  cmd   Command for which times are to be displayed.  

DOCUMENTATION	time(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tip
	
DESCRIPTION	The tip command connects you with remote systems.

SYNTAX		tip [ options ] system

		  system   System to which you are to be connected.  You can 
			   indicate the system by specifying either hostname
			   or phone number.

OPTIONS		-#   Uses specified number (#) as baud rate.
		-v   Displays all variable settings.

DOCUMENTATION	tip(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tk

DESCRIPTION	The tk command paginates output for the Tektronix 4014
		terminal.

SYNTAX	  	tk [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of the file to be processed.  If not
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-#   Uses the specified number (#) as the number of 
		     columns for the screen output.
		
		-p   Uses the specified number (-pn) as the page length.

		-t   Does not pause between pages.  If not specified,
		     pauses after each page and reads stdin until 
		     <RETURN> before proceeding.

DOCUMENTATION   tk(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-touch
	
DESCRIPTION	The touch command updates the modification date of each 
		specified file.

SYNTAX		touch [ -c ] file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If a file does
			 not exist, attempts to create it with current date.

OPTIONS		-c   Does not attempt to create file if it does not exist.

DOCUMENTATION	touch(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tp
	
DESCRIPTION	The tp command archives files to/from tape.

SYNTAX		tp [ key ]

KEYS		0-7  Uses specified number to indicate tape drive.  If not 
		     specified, uses RX50 as the default device.
		c    Creates a new tape archive.
		d    Deletes specified files (next arguments) from tape.
		f    Uses specified file (next argument) in place of 
		     tape.
		g    Uses 6250 BPI tape in place of RX50s.
		h    Uses 1600 BPI tape in place of RX50s.
		i    Displays read/write errors, but proceeds instead of 
		     returning to command level.
		k    Uses TK50 in place of RX50s.
		m    Uses 800 BPI tape in place of Rx50s.
		r    Replaces specified files (next arguments) on tape.
		t    Lists names of specified files (next arguments) if each 
		     appears on tape.  If files not specified, lists
		     names of all files on tape.
		u    Updates specified files (next arguments) only if each
		     has been modified since modification time of copy already
		     on tape. 
		v    Displays verbose information as it archives each file.
		w    Waits for confirmation response before proceeding.
		x    Extracts specified files (next arguments) from tape.

DOCUMENTATION	tp(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tr

DESCRIPTION	The tr command translates the specified character string.

SYNTAX		tr [ options ] [ string1 [ string2 ] ] 

		  string1   Character string to be translated. 

		  string2   Character string to be translated to.

		Strings can be specified by a character (c), a range of 
		characters (c-c), or an octal number (\###).

OPTIONS		-c   Translates compliments: string1 to those not in string1.
		-d   Deletes all characters in string1 from output.
		-s   Squeezes multiple occurrences of a character in string1 
		     to one.

EXAMPLES	tr 0-9 0 
		tr -s ' ' 

DOCUMENTATION	tr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-troff
	
DESCRIPTION	The troff command provides a text formatter with a full subset
		of macros for phototypesetting.

SYNTAX		troff [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be formatted.  If not specified,
			 or if - is specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 formats this input.

OPTIONS		-a   Sends ASCII approximations to stdout.
		-b   Reports status of phototypesetter only (no formatting).
		-f   Does not feed paper and stop typesetter at end of run.
		-g   Prepares output for GCOS phototypesetter and writes it
		     to stdout.
		-i   Reads stdin after input files are processed.
		-m   Uses specified macro package (-mxx) in formatting text.
		-n   Uses specified number (-n#) as first page to be printed.
		-o   Uses specified list (-olist) as only pages to be printed.
		-p   Uses specified number (-p#) as desired point size.
		-q   Invokes simultaneous input/output mode.
		-r   Sets named register to specified value (-rxv).
		-s   Stops after specified number of pages (-s#).
		-t   Writes output to stdout, not to phototypesetter.
		-w   Waits for phototypesetter if currently busy.

DOCUMENTATION	troff(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"NROFF/TROFF User's Manual" and "A TROFF Tutorial" in the 
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1 
-true
	
DESCRIPTION	The true command forces a successful exit status.

SYNTAX		true

DOCUMENTATION	true(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tset

DESCRIPTION	The tset command sets your terminal mode.

SYNTAX	  	tset [ options ]

OPTIONS		-I   Does not transmit terminal initialization strings.
		-Q   Suppresses erase and kill character message.
		-S   Displays assigned strings as set by TERM variable
		     and from /etc/termcap file.
		-e   Uses the specified character (-ex) as the erase
		     character.  If not specified, uses <DELETE>.
		-k   Uses the specified character (-kx) as the kill
		     character.  
		-m   Uses the specified argument string for the terminal
		     map.  The optional arguments, in the order 
		     specified, are: port type, identifier, baud rate,
		     and terminal type.
		-n   Initializes the "new" tty driver, if applicable.
		-v   Sets the mode to a nonvirtual terminal.  
		
DOCUMENTATION   tset(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tsort
	
DESCRIPTION	The tsort command generates a topologically sorted list of
		items from data in the specified file.

SYNTAX		tsort [ file ]

		  file    Name of file to be processed.  If not specified,
			  reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and sorts this input.

DOCUMENTATION	tsort(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-tty
	
DESCRIPTION	The tty command displays the name of your terminal.

SYNTAX		tty

DOCUMENTATION	tty(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-u
	
DESCRIPTION	The u command displays the names of each user who 
		currently is logged on the system.

SYNTAX		u

DOCUMENTATION	users(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual

-ul
	
DESCRIPTION	The ul command formats underscored text for your terminal type.

SYNTAX		ul [ options ] [ file... ] 

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-i   Displays underscoring on separate line containing 
		     appropriate dashes (-).
		-t   Uses type of specified terminal (next argument) in place
		     your terminal's type.

DOCUMENTATION	ul(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-uname

DESCRIPTION	The uname command displays the name of your current
		host system.

SYNTAX	  	uname [ options ]

OPTIONS		-a   Displays all information: shorthand for -mnrsv.
		-m   Displays the machine hardware type.
		-n   Displays the network node name.
		-r   Displays the operating system's release number.
		-s   Displays the host system name (default option).
		-v   Displays the operating system's version number.

DOCUMENTATION   uname(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-unedit

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS unedit command removes a copy of an SCCS file opened
		for edit without merging any changes made back to the original
		SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs unedit file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be unedited.

DOCUMENTATION	"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-unexpand

DESCRIPTION	The unexpand command converts spaces in each specified
		file to tabs.

SYNTAX	  	unexpand [ -a ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not 
			 specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and
			 processes this input.

OPTIONS		-a   Compresses the file whenever possible by inserting
		     tabs for two or more spaces.
		
DOCUMENTATION   expand(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-unget

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS unget command undoes an SCCS edit command (get -e).

SYNTAX		sccs unget [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-n  Retains copy of SCCS file which normally is removed 
		    from current directory.
		-r  Indicates delta version number (-r#).
		-s  Suppresses all messages.

DOCUMENTATION	unget(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-uniq

DESCRIPTION	The uniq command removes repeated lines from a file.

SYNTAX		uniq [ options ] [ +num ] [ file1 [ file2 ] ]

		  +num 	   Skips specified number of characters (num) in 
			   addition to the specified fields. 

		  file1    Name of input file to be processed.  If not 
			   specified, reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and 
			   processes this input.

		  file2    Name of output file to which all unique lines
			   are written.  If not specified, writes output 
			   to stdout.

OPTIONS		-#   Skips additional number of fields (#).
		-c   Displays number of repetitions, if any, for each line.
		-d   Displays only lines that were repeated.
		-u   Displays only unique (nonrepeated) lines.

DOCUMENTATION	uniq(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-units
	
DESCRIPTION     The units command provides an interactive conversion program 
		with a full subset of conversion scales.

SYNTAX	  	units

DOCUMENTATION	units(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-unpack

DESCRIPTION	The unpack command expands the compressed data in
		each specified file.

SYNTAX	  	unpack file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION   pack(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-uptime

DESCRIPTION	The uptime command displays performance information
		about your system.

SYNTAX	  	uptime

DOCUMENTATION   uptime(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-users
	
DESCRIPTION	The users command displays the names of each user who currently
		is logged on the system.

SYNTAX		users

DOCUMENTATION	users(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-uucp
	
DESCRIPTION	The uucp command copies files to remote systems.

SYNTAX		uucp [ options ] file... system...
 
		  file    Name of each file to be copied to specified
			  remote system.

		  system  Destination system and optional pathname to which
			  files are to be copied.   

OPTIONS		-c   Copies each file to remote system directly from source. 
		     Normally, copies file to spool directory and then to 
		     remote system.
		-d   Creates all necessary directories before copying.
		-m   Notifies you by mail when copying is completed.

DOCUMENTATION	uucp(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Uucp Implementation Description" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-uulog
	
DESCRIPTION	The uulog command maintains a summary of all uucp and uux
		transactions.

SYNTAX		uulog [ options ]

OPTIONS		-s   Displays information about specified system (-ssystem).
		-u   Displays information about specified user (-uuser).

DOCUMENTATION	uucp(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Uucp Implementation Description" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-uustat

DESCRIPTION	The uustat command displays status information about
		and provides control of uucp jobs.

SYNTAX	  	uustat [ options ]

OPTIONS		-c   Removes entries for requests that are older than 
		     the specified time (-ctime).
		-j   Displays status information for the specified job
		     only (-jnnn).  If -jall is specified, displays
		     information for all jobs.
		-k   Kills the specified job (-knnn).
		-m   Displays accessibility status of the specified 
		     machine (-mmachine).  If -mall is specified,
		     displays information for all machines.
		-o   Displays information for requests that are older
		     than the specified time (-otime).
		-s   Displays information for requests that are destined
		     for the specified system (-ssystem).
		-u   Displays information for requests made by the 
		     specified user (-uname).
		-v   Displays detailed (verbose) information.
		-y   Displays information for requests that are younger
		     than the specified time (-ytime).
		
DOCUMENTATION   uustat(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-uux
	
DESCRIPTION	The uux command executes specified commands on remote systems.

SYNTAX		uux [ - ] string...

		  String   Each argument that makes up system-command string 
			   to be executed.  If first argument is system!, 
			   remaining command and arguments are executed on 
			   that system.  If system! is not first argument,  
			   command and arguments are executed on your local 
			   system.  For further information, read the uux 
			   manual page.

OPTIONS		-   Reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and uses input as system-command
		    string.

DOCUMENTATION	uux(1c) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Uucp Implementation Description in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
-v7tar
	
DESCRIPTION	The v7tar command archives files to and from tape.

SYNTAX		tar [ key ]

KEYS		B   Creates a new tape archive.
		0-7 Uses specified number (0-7) as drive on which tape is
		    mounted.
		b   Uses specified number (next argument) as blocking factor.
		    Maximum blocking is 20. If not specified, uses 1 (tape) 
		    and 10 (RX50 diskette).
		c   Creates new tape archive.
		d   Uses RX50 diskettes in place of tape.  
		f   Uses specified special file (next argument) as tape drive.
		l   Reports if cannot resolve all links to file being dumped.
		    If not specified, no messages are displayed.
		m   Does not restore the modification time for each file: uses
		    time of extraction.
		n   Uses 800 BPI tape.
		o   Suppresses normal directory output.
		p   Changes mode of extracted files to their original mode.
		r   Writes specified files to end-of-tape.
		t   Displays names of specified files (next arguments) if
		    each appears on tape.  If names are not specified, 
		    displays all names on tape.
		u   Updates specified files (next arguments) if not on tape or
		    if each has been modified since modification time of copy
		    already on tape.
		v   Displays verbose information as it archives each file.
		w   Waits for confirmation response before proceeding.
		x   Extracts only named files (next arguments) from tape.

DOCUMENTATION	v7tar(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-val

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS val command validates the specified SCCS files.

SYNTAX		sccs val [ options ] file...

		  file   Name of each SCCS file to be processed.

OPTIONS		-m  Compares specified value (-mstring) with helptext1 keyword.
		-r  Indicates specified delta version number (-r#).
		-s  Suppresses all error messages.
		-y  Compares specified type (-ystring) with  keyword.

DOCUMENTATION	val(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-vc

DESCRIPTION	The vc command copies lines from stdin to stdout in 
		accordance with the specified control arguments.

SYNTAX	  	vc [ options ] [ keyword ]

		  keyword   Replaces each specified keyword found in 
			    the text with its defined value 
			    (keyword=value).

OPTIONS		-a   Replaces the keywords surrounded by control 
		     characters in all text lines.
		-c   Uses the specified character (-cx) as the control
		     character.  If not specified, uses a colon (:).
		-s   Suppresses all warning messages.
		-t   Ignores all characters from the beginning of the
		     line to the first tab.
		
DOCUMENTATION   vc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-vi
	
DESCRIPTION	The vi command provides an interactive, line-oriented editor 
		that has full-screen display and a full subset of commands.

SYNTAX		vi [ options ] [ +cmd ] file...

		  +cmd   Starts edit session with  specified command (cmd).

		  file   Name of each file to be edited.  If more than one 
			 file is specified, edits each file in succession. 
			 For further information, read about the :n command 
			 in the vi manual page.

OPTIONS		-l  Sets up edit session for LISP.
		-r  Recovers an edit session lost because of a system crash.
		-t  Searches file for and begins session at occurrence of
		    specified string (next argument).
		-w  Uses specified number (-w#) as screen window size.

DOCUMENTATION	vi(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to Display Editing with vi" and "Ex Reference
		Manual" in the ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-w

DESCRIPTION	The w command displays who is logged into the system
		and what they are currently doing.

SYNTAX	  	w [ options ] [ user ]

		  user   User login name for which information is 
			 to be displayed.  If not specified, displays 
			 information for all users.

OPTIONS		-h   Suppresses the normal header from the output.
		-l   Displays information in long format (default 
		     option).
		-s   Displays information in short format.
		
DOCUMENTATION   w(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-wait
	
DESCRIPTION	The wait command suspends execution until all background
		processes have completed.

SYNTAX		wait

DOCUMENTATION	wait(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-wall
	
DESCRIPTION	The wall command writes a message to all users currently logged
		in to the system.

SYNTAX		wall

DOCUMENTATION	wall(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-wc
	
DESCRIPTION	The wc command displays the number of words, lines, and 
		characters in each specified file.

SYNTAX		wc [ options ] [ file... ]

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.  If not specified,
			 reads stdin until <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-c   Displays number of characters only.
		-l   Displays number of lines only.
		-w   Displays number of words only.

DOCUMENTATION	wc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-what

DESCRIPTION	The SCCS what command displays ID keywords from each specified
		SCCS file.

SYNTAX		sccs what file...

		  file   Name of each file to be processed.

DOCUMENTATION	what(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"An Introduction to the Source Code Control System" in the
		ULTRIX-11 Supplementary Documents, Volume 1
-whatis

DESCRIPTION	The whatis command displays information about
		each specified command.

SYNTAX	  	whatis cmd...

		  cmd   Name of each command for which information is to
		 	be displayed.

DOCUMENTATION   whatis(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-which

DESCRIPTION	The which command takes a list of command names and
		displays which programs (files) would be executed.

SYNTAX	  	which [ cmd... ]
 
		  cmd   Name of each command for which information
			is to be displayed.

DOCUMENTATION   which(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-who
	
DESCRIPTION	The who command displays a list of users currently logged in
		to the system.

SYNTAX		who [ file ]

		  file   Name of login accounting file from which list is to 
			 be generated.  If not specified, generates list
			 from information in /etc/utmp.

DOCUMENTATION	who(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-whoami
	
DESCRIPTION	The whoami command displays your current login name.

SYNTAX		whoami

DOCUMENTATION	whoami(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-write
	
DESCRIPTION	The write command writes a message to the specified user.

SYNTAX		write user [ special ]

		  user      Login name of user to receive message.

		  special   Name of special file for terminal to which 
			    message is to be written.  This argument is 
			    useful when a user is logged in at multiple
			    terminals.

DOCUMENTATION	write(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-xstr
	
DESCRIPTION	The xstr command extracts strings from a C program.

SYNTAX		xstr [ options ] [ file ]

		  file   Name of C program to be processed.  If file is not
			 specified or if - is specified, reads stdin until 
			 <CTRL/D> and processes this input.

OPTIONS		-c   Extracts strings from specified C source (next argument).

DOCUMENTATION	xstr(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
-yacc
	
DESCRIPTION	The yacc command converts specified grammar constructs into 
		tables for processing by a parsing algorithm. 

SYNTAX		yacc [ options ] grammar

		  grammar   User input to be processed.

OPTIONS		-d   Writes all define statements to y.tab.h file.
		-v   Writes parsing tables and report of grammatical conflicts 
		     to y.output file.

DOCUMENTATION	yacc(1) in the ULTRIX-11 Programmer's Manual
		"Yacc: Yet Another Compiler-Compiler" in the ULTRIX-11 
		Supplementary Documents, Volume 2
